firmware development
----------
1. 
Role Overview



We are seeking a highly skilled Embedded Firmware & Security Engineer to design, develop, and secure embedded systems for real-time industrial and pharmacy automation hardware platforms. The ideal candidate will have strong experience in C/C++ firmware development, Linux kernel-level work, real-time control systems, and embedded security implementations.

This role requires deep expertise in both low-level firmware development and secure communication architecture across connected devices.



Key ResponsibilitiesFirmware & Embedded Development

﻿

Develop and maintain C/C++ embedded firmware
Work with Renesas H8S toolchain and microcontroller-based systems
Develop and debug Linux kernel-level components (PICO-PI or similar platforms)
Design and implement real-time control systems
Integrate firmware with pharmacy/industrial automation hardware
Optimize system performance and memory usage




Embedded Security & Network Architecture

Implement mTLS/TLS-based secure communication
Develop and integrate RFID authentication systems
Design secure device provisioning and certificate management
Implement network segmentation and device-level security controls
Perform threat modeling and risk analysis
Harden embedded databases (e.g., Firebird DB hardening)
Conduct secure firmware update design (OTA/secure boot – good to have)




System Engineering

Participate in architecture reviews and protocol security assessments
Collaborate with backend and hardware teams
Support SCA scans and vulnerability remediation
Contribute to secure SDLC documentation




Required Skills & QualificationsMandatory Skills

Strong expertise in C/C++ embedded firmware development
Experience with Renesas H8S or similar microcontrollers
Linux kernel or low-level Linux systems programming
Real-time operating systems (RTOS) experience
TLS/mTLS implementation knowledge
Embedded cryptography fundamentals
Network security basics (segmentation, firewall rules, etc.)
Experience with RFID-based authentication systems
Threat modeling and secure design principles




Good to Have

Pharmacy automation or medical device domain experience
Firebird DB hardening experience
Secure boot / OTA update implementation
IEC/ISO security standards exposure (medical/industrial)
Experience in regulated environments




Soft Skills

Strong problem-solving and debugging skills
Ability to work with cross-functional teams (hardware, backend, DevOps)
Strong documentation skills
Risk-aware and security-first mindset


-------------

2. 
About the job
WHAT YOU DO AT AMD CHANGES EVERYTHING

At AMD, our mission is to build great products that accelerate next-generation computing experiences—from AI and data centers, to PCs, gaming and embedded systems. Grounded in a culture of innovation and collaboration, we believe real progress comes from bold ideas, human ingenuity and a shared passion to create something extraordinary. When you join AMD, you’ll discover the real differentiator is our culture. We push the limits of innovation to solve the world’s most important challenges—striving for execution excellence, while being direct, humble, collaborative, and inclusive of diverse perspectives. Join us as we shape the future of AI and beyond. Together, we advance your career. 

Firmware Engineer- Power Management 

The Person

We are looking for a motivated engineer who thrives in a fast-paced, team-oriented environment. You should be comfortable meeting deadlines, solving complex software problems, and collaborating across teams. Strong technical, communication, and interpersonal skills are essential.

The Role

Power Management Firmware Engineer will play key role in ensuring AMD Embedded firmware (Power Management & Device enumeration) addresses critical Embedded market segment (Networking, Storage, Automotive, Thin client) requirements performing the below:

Key Responsibilities

Contribute towards AMD Embedded firmware development for PMFW, DXIO 
Collaborate with core firmware teams and ensuring Embedded requirements are addressed 
Work with Platform Firmware Organization (PFO) in conjunction with Embedded segment architects to meet product requirements 
Review key firmware requirement / enhancement inputs pertaining to focused Embedded markets 
Provide custom firmware design support for tier-1 customers by with identifying solution and providing design documents 
Design, develop, test, review features / releases pertaining to PMFW, DXIO firmware 
Provide low level design documents and user guides 
Assist customer support team in addressing any firmware related queries 


Preferred Experience

9-15 years experience in hands on firmware development. 
Strong with C language programming 
Good understanding and experience with BIOS, power management and PCIe 
Strong knowledge of UEFI BIOS, ACPI. AGESA knowledge is a big plus 
Strong knowledge of platform BIOS development 
Good knowledge SoC power management – CPU/Device power states, hot-plug etc 
Firmware development & release process understanding 
Prior experience working with firmware design & development 
OS/Drivers/Software stack understanding is a plus 
Excellent communication and articulation skills 


Academic Credentials

BS or MS in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or Electrical Engineering preferred.


LOCATION:

Bengaluru

Benefits offered are described: AMD benefits at a glance.

AMD does not accept unsolicited resumes from headhunters, recruitment agencies, or fee-based recruitment services. AMD and its subsidiaries are equal opportunity, inclusive employers and will consider all applicants without regard to age, ancestry, color, marital status, medical condition, mental or physical disability, national origin, race, religion, political and/or third-party affiliation, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, military or veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law. We encourage applications from all qualified candidates and will accommodate applicants’ needs under the respective laws throughout all stages of the recruitment and selection process.

AMD may use Artificial Intelligence to help screen, assess or select applicants for this position. AMD’s “Responsible AI Policy” is available here.

This posting is for an existing vacancy.


----------


3. 
About the job
This role has been designed as ‘Hybrid’ with an expectation that you will work on average 2 days per week from an HPE office.

Who We Are

Hewlett Packard Enterprise is the global edge-to-cloud company advancing the way people live and work. We help companies connect, protect, analyze, and act on their data and applications wherever they live, from edge to cloud, so they can turn insights into outcomes at the speed required to thrive in today’s complex world. Our culture thrives on finding new and better ways to accelerate what’s next. We know varied backgrounds are valued and succeed here. We have the flexibility to manage our work and personal needs. We make bold moves, together, and are a force for good. If you are looking to stretch and grow your career our culture will embrace you. Open up opportunities with HPE.

Job Description

Compute at HPE helps organizations power their edge-to-cloud platform with proven, workload-optimized products, solutions, and services. Our leading supercomputing technologies enable customers to transform and modernize their IT infrastructure, solve complex problems and support new business opportunities with purpose-built infrastructure and software. Join us redefine what’s next for you.

What You'll Do

Active participation in all activities necessary to take a product from concept to production including Design, Implementation, Testing, etc.
Contribution to functional specification, defining engineering functional plan
Designs, develops, troubleshoots and debugs software programs for software enhancements and new products.
Interactions with cross functional teams, factory and customer support.
Contributions include applying intermediate level of subject matter expertise to solve common technical problems. Acts as an informed team member providing analysis of information and recommendations for appropriate action. Works independently within an established framework and with moderate supervision.

Education Qualification

What you need to bring:

A BE/ME (degree in ECE, CE, CS) or MCA with 3+ years of industry experience in System Management software development.

Core Competencies

Strong firmware / System development background with strong C/C++ development/debug skills.
Strong in Embedded Linux/RTOS programming, OS Internals, memory management, IPC, thread programming and embedded application software development.
Proficient in software development tools such as IDEs, compilers, debuggers, emulators, source control system and defect/ bug tracking systems.
Solid understanding of DMTF-REDFISH, Rest Based architecture.
Good understanding of HTTP/HTTPs, SNMP, IPMI protocols. Experience/exposure to I2C, MCTP, NCSI protocol is a plus.

Other Skills

Person should have excellent understanding of Linux/RTOS OS internals and strong development experience.
Server manageability experience will be a major plus.
Fault tolerant systems and high availability is a plus.
Strong communication skills both verbal and written.

Additional Skills

Cloud Architectures, Cross Domain Knowledge, Design Thinking, Development Fundamentals, DevOps, Distributed Computing, Microservices Fluency, Full Stack Development, Security-First Mindset, Solutions Design, Testing & Automation, User Experience (UX)

What We Can Offer You

Health & Wellbeing

We strive to provide our team members and their loved ones with a comprehensive suite of benefits that supports their physical, financial and emotional wellbeing.

Personal & Professional Development

We also invest in your career because the better you are, the better we all are. We have specific programs catered to helping you reach any career goals you have — whether you want to become a knowledge expert in your field or apply your skills to another division.

Unconditional Inclusion

We are unconditionally inclusive in the way we work and celebrate individual uniqueness. We know varied backgrounds are valued and succeed here. We have the flexibility to manage our work and personal needs. We make bold moves, together, and are a force for good.

Let's Stay Connected

Follow @HPECareers on Instagram to see the latest on people, culture and tech at HPE.

#india

#compute

Job

Engineering

Job Level

TCP_02

HPE is an Equal Employment Opportunity/ Veterans/Disabled/LGBT employer. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, gender, or any other protected category, and all decisions we make are made on the basis of qualifications, merit, and business need. Our goal is to be one global team that is representative of our customers, in an inclusive environment where we can continue to innovate and grow together. Please click here: Equal Employment Opportunity.

Hewlett Packard Enterprise is EEO Protected Veteran/ Individual with Disabilities.

HPE will comply with all applicable laws related to employer use of arrest and conviction records, including laws requiring employers to consider for employment qualified applicants with criminal histories.

--------------------------------


4.

About the job
Company

Qualcomm India Private Limited

Job Area

Engineering Group, Engineering Group > Software Engineering

General Summary

As a software engineer in the WLAN firmware group, you will be designing, developing, unit testing, bug fixing and maintaining WLAN firmware components that implements functional aspects of WLAN features on low memory foot print processors that will work in tandem with device drivers running on the host processors. The host driver and the firmware implement the WLAN drivers on the Qualcomm’s WLAN SoC platforms. As part of this team, you will be working on cutting edge WiFi technologies, solving challenging WiFi design & performance issues and working with some of the leading WiFi ODMs & OEMs across the globe on their sometimes high pressure & tough timelines. Also, Co-work with Hardware designer to verify hardware (MAC) features and debug hardware (MAC) issues; - Co-work with Driver team to debug software/firmware interface issues; - Co-work with algorithm team to diagnose WLAN RF systems performance issues.

Skills/Experience

1+ years of relevant hands-on technical experience in WLAN/Linux driver development with a record of strong individual technical achievement 
Strong programming skills in C 
Knowledge on Ethernet and Wireless LAN driver development preferred 
Knowledge on IP Networking technologies is a plus 
RF level knowledge is a plus 
Knowledge of C/C++ language 
Knowledge on wireless industry standards (IEEE 802.11a/b/g/n/ac/ax) and RF will be a strong plus. 
Excellent verbal and written communication skills 
Should be able to work in an aggressive, high pressure environment 


Minimum Qualifications

 Bachelor's degree in Engineering, Information Systems, Computer Science, or related field.


Applicants: Qualcomm is an equal opportunity employer. If you are an individual with a disability and need an accommodation during the application/hiring process, rest assured that Qualcomm is committed to providing an accessible process. You may e-mail disability-accomodations@qualcomm.com or call Qualcomm's toll-free number found here. Upon request, Qualcomm will provide reasonable accommodations to support individuals with disabilities to be able participate in the hiring process. Qualcomm is also committed to making our workplace accessible for individuals with disabilities. (Keep in mind that this email address is used to provide reasonable accommodations for individuals with disabilities. We will not respond here to requests for updates on applications or resume inquiries).

Qualcomm expects its employees to abide by all applicable policies and procedures, including but not limited to security and other requirements regarding protection of Company confidential information and other confidential and/or proprietary information, to the extent those requirements are permissible under applicable law.

To all Staffing and Recruiting Agencies: Our Careers Site is only for individuals seeking a job at Qualcomm. Staffing and recruiting agencies and individuals being represented by an agency are not authorized to use this site or to submit profiles, applications or resumes, and any such submissions will be considered unsolicited. Qualcomm does not accept unsolicited resumes or applications from agencies. Please do not forward resumes to our jobs alias, Qualcomm employees or any other company location. Qualcomm is not responsible for any fees related to unsolicited resumes/applications.

=---------------
5. 
About the job
Description

Imagine being part of a team building the future of wearable technology. Amazon is focused on developing devices that seamlessly integrate technology and design into forms that are familiar to millions of people, in ways that have never been done before. From innovative smart glasses to a growing lineup of cutting-edge wearable devices, we are redefining how people engage with the world around them.

If you are excited about pushing the envelope and developing brand-new experiences that empower users to do more as they engage with the physical world, we would love to meet you.

We are looking for a passionate, talented Software Development Engineer with a growth mindset and a versatile skill set to help us bring this vision to life.

Key job responsibilities

Role

We are looking for a talented and passionate Software Engineer to be part of an exciting team building device software. You will have an enormous opportunity to make a large impact on the design, architecture, and implementation of cutting edge products used every day, by people you know. In this role, you will:

 Be responsible for system architecture and development of new features for embedded systems
 Investigate, prototype and deliver new and innovative system solutions
 Design, develop and verify firmware for embedded systems
 Participate in design reviews, API development, and documentation
 Work with new technologies that are vital to product development
 Deliver investigation plans and reports, architectural documents, design specs, software and firmware source code, build scripts

Build expertise in one or more core wireless technologies- WiFi, Bluetooth

 Perform tasks including debug, bring-up, Beta and production software development
 Successfully collaborate with both software and hardware product teams

About The Team

Our team puts a high value on work-life balance. It isn’t about how many hours you spend at home or at work; it’s about how you bring energy to both parts of your life. We believe striking the right balance between your personal and professional life is critical to life-long happiness and fulfillment. We offer flexibility in working hours and encourage you to find your own balance between your work and personal lives.

Our team is dedicated to supporting new members. We have a broad mix of experience levels and tenures, and we’re building an environment that celebrates knowledge sharing and mentorship. Our senior members enjoy one-on-one mentoring and thorough, but kind, code reviews. We care about your career growth and strive to assign projects based on what will help each team member develop into a better-rounded engineer and enable them to take on more complex tasks in the future.

Basic Qualifications

 3+ years of embedded firmware development experience
 Bachelor's degree in computer science or equivalent
 Experience in computer science fundamentals (object-oriented design, data structures, algorithm design, problem solving and complexity analysis)
 Experience in one or more of these areas: cameras, sensors and associated algorithm development
 Experience in embedded software design, development and debugging preferably on ARM based platforms
 Experience in coding in C/C++
 Experience with RTOS and embedded Linux development
 Board level experience

Preferred Qualifications

 Experience in written and verbal communication skills to communicate with technical and non-technical audiences, including senior leadership
 Experience working across teams and influencing teams that are not your own
 Strong debugging/trouble-shooting skills of embedded systems
 Experience with some wireless technology- WiFi, Bluetooth
 Experience with real time debugging tools (software and hardware)
 Experience with ARM based SOC architecture
 Excellent judgment, organizational, and problem solving skills
 Can mentor other software developers to maintain architectural vision and software quality

Our inclusive culture empowers Amazonians to deliver the best results for our customers. If you have a disability and need a workplace accommodation or adjustment during the application and hiring process, including support for the interview or onboarding process, please visit https://amazon.jobs/content/en/how-we-hire/accommodations for more information. If the country/region you’re applying in isn’t listed, please contact your Recruiting Partner.

_-----------

6.
About the job
Job Requirements 

Embedded Firmware Engineer

Job Description:

BE / B.Tech / M.tech:

4 to 7 years of experience in Embedded firmware & application development and communication protocols

Mandatory Skills:

Domain skills:

Industrial Control & Automation
Industrial communication protocols
Prior hands-on experience in EtherNet IP / IEC61850 / Profibus / Modbus TCP protocol standards and implementation experience

Technology And Tool Skills:

Hands on experience in design / architecture for embedded control systems - firmware and applications using object-oriented concepts
Hands on experience - Strong in C, C++, UML
Hands on experience in RTOS – VxWorks
Hands on experience in development and testing of communication protocols stacks
Ability to understand all layers right from BSP, device drivers, middleware and application layers
Testing, test tools like Lauterbach, ICE, Trace32, Test complete, Enterprise Architect etc.
Static code analysis, tools like PCLint, Klocwork etc.
Hands on experience on using configuration management tools - TFS. Knowledge on activities like branching, baselines, code and design reviews process.

Others:

Embedded systems projects involving hands on design and implementation.
Prior experience on safety critical software development is highly preferred.
Must have been involved in full product life cycle for any of the products involving real time embedded software systems.
Good communication skills – written and oral
Very good team player, should be able to work with teams from different regions spread across the world.

Work Experience 

Embedded Firmware Engineer

Others:

Embedded systems projects involving hands on design and implementation.
Prior experience on safety critical software development is highly preferred.
Must have been involved in full product life cycle for any of the products involving real time embedded software systems.
Good communication skills – written and oral
Very good team player, should be able to work with teams from different regions spread across the world.

-----------

7.
About the job
About Quin

Quin is redefining smart safety with real-time event detection and data-driven response systems that save lives. We embed our proprietary technology into helmets and wearables through B2B partnerships with global brands. With a strong foothold in motorcycling and a strategic focus on Cycling and Industrial Safety, our technology is already trusted by top names across the U.S. and Europe. We’re a fast-moving, purpose-driven team building industry-leading technology that brings intelligence into safety gear.

About The Role

We’re looking for a Firmware / Embedded Systems Engineer with 3 to 5 years of hands-on experience in embedded development to support the design and optimization of cutting-edge low-power, sensor-driven wireless devices. In this role, you’ll be working on performance-critical systems involving BLE connectivity, real-time data processing, and custom hardware integrations.

This is a great opportunity for an engineer who enjoys digging deep into firmware performance, power optimization, and working across the entire embedded stack—from board bring-up to wireless protocols and sensor data management.

Key Responsibilities

Develop, test, and maintain embedded firmware for custom hardware platforms, with a strong focus on BLE-based communication systems.
Integrate and optimize sensors such as IMUs, accelerometers (digital and analog), and other low-power peripherals.
Work with flash file systems, bootloaders, and memory management strategies for efficient data handling.
Drive power optimization efforts across firmware, including deep sleep modes, peripheral management, and runtime tuning.
Contribute to antenna and RF performance optimization in collaboration with hardware and RF teams.
Support synchronized data collection across multiple devices for real-time streaming and data logging applications.
Collaborate with cross-functional teams including hardware, app, and data science to deliver seamless end-to-end product functionality.

Basic Qualifications

B.Tech. or M.S. in Electronics Engineering, Embedded Engineering, or related discipline.
3–5 years of experience developing embedded firmware in C/C++ for ARM Cortex-M or similar microcontrollers.
Proven experience with Bluetooth Low Energy (BLE) stacks and custom BLE services/profiles.
Experience with IMUs, accelerometers, and integrating sensor data into real-time applications.
Familiarity with flash memory, embedded file systems, and bootloaders.
Strong debugging skills using tools like JTAG/SWD, oscilloscopes, logic analyzers, and protocol sniffers.

Preferred Qualifications

Experience with Nordic Semiconductor devices and the nRF Connect SDK (NCS).
Knowledge of low-power design principles and techniques for battery-operated devices.
Background in RF/antenna tuning and wireless performance testing.
Understanding of BLE live streaming, synchronized data collection, and time-stamping accuracy across devices.
Familiarity with protocols like Find My, ANT+, or other proprietary wireless standards is a strong plus.
Exposure to both digital and analog accelerometers and their trade-offs in embedded systems.

-----------------------
8.

About the job
Senior Firmware Design Engineer

We Are:

At Synopsys, we drive the innovations that shape the way we live and connect. Our technology is central to the Era of Pervasive Intelligence, from self-driving cars to learning machines. We lead in chip design, verification, and IP integration, empowering the creation of high-performance silicon chips and software content. Join us to transform the future through continuous technological innovation.

At Synopsys, we’re at the heart of the innovations that change the way we work and play. Self-driving cars. Artificial Intelligence. The cloud. 5G. The Internet of Things. These breakthroughs are ushering in the Era of Smart Everything. And we’re powering it all with the world’s most advanced technologies for chip design and software security. If you share our passion for innovation, we want to meet you.

Our Silicon IP business is all about integrating more capabilities into an SoC—faster. We offer the world’s broadest portfolio of silicon IP—predesigned blocks, memory, interfaces, analog, security, and embedded processors. All to help customers integrate more capabilities, meet unique performance, power, and size requirements of their target applications, and get differentiated products to market quickly with reduced risk.

You Are:

You are a passionate and inventive engineer who thrives at the intersection of hardware and software. As a Firmware Staff Engineer, you bring a strong digital design background and a keen understanding of embedded software development, particularly in bare metal environments. You are motivated by the challenge of working at the cutting edge of mixed-signal and high-speed SerDes technology, continuously learning and applying new concepts to real-world solutions.

You value collaboration and clear communication, adept at working across multidisciplinary teams to drive complex projects from concept to silicon validation. Your attention to detail ensures robust, reliable firmware, while your proactive mindset helps you anticipate issues and deliver high-quality results under tight deadlines. You are committed to structured development practices, embracing documentation and verification as essential parts of the engineering process.

Your curiosity leads you to explore emerging standards and scripting tools, and you are always eager to share knowledge and mentor less experienced colleagues. Above all, you are driven by a desire to have a tangible impact on the technology that powers tomorrow’s innovations.

What You’ll Be Doing:

Design, develop, and debug bare metal firmware for advanced mixed-signal and high-speed SerDes products.
Collaborate with digital and mixed-signal design teams to define firmware requirements and system integration strategies.
Lead and participate in the structured development, verification, and documentation of firmware solutions.
Execute and drive projects from specification through to silicon bring-up and functional validation on prototype test-chips.
Support internal and external customers by troubleshooting and resolving firmware-related issues in a timely manner.
Continuously evaluate and adopt new methodologies, tools, and standards to improve firmware quality and development efficiency.
Mentor junior engineers and contribute to a culture of knowledge sharing and technical excellence.

The Impact You Will Have:

Accelerate the integration of advanced capabilities into customer SoCs, reducing product time-to-market.
Enhance the reliability and performance of next-generation SerDes and mixed-signal products through robust firmware development.
Enable seamless collaboration across design, verification, and application teams, ensuring delivery of high-quality solutions.
Drive innovation by introducing new firmware techniques and best practices to the team.
Support customer success by providing expert guidance and rapid resolution of firmware challenges.
Contribute to Synopsys’ reputation as a leader in silicon IP and embedded systems solutions.

What You’ll Need:

BSEE or MSEE with a minimum of 5 years of experience in bare metal firmware development and silicon testing.
Strong understanding of digital design principles, including RTL-level concepts and methodologies.
Proven experience with structured firmware development, verification, and comprehensive documentation processes.
Demonstrated ability to drive projects from inception to successful completion, including silicon bring-up and validation.
Excellent communication skills, enabling effective interaction with cross-functional teams and customers.
Basic knowledge of SerDes standards and protocols is a plus.
Experience with scripting languages such as Shell or Python is advantageous.

Who You Are:

Self-motivated, proactive, and results-driven, with a passion for quality and innovation.
Organized and detail-oriented, capable of managing multiple priorities and meeting tight deadlines.
Collaborative team player who values clear and open communication.
Adaptable and eager to learn new technologies and methodologies.
Resourceful problem solver with a customer-centric mindset.

The Team You’ll Be A Part Of:

You will join a highly experienced and diverse mixed-signal design and verification team dedicated to developing leading-edge SerDes and mixed-signal IP solutions. The team thrives on collaboration and continuous learning, working closely with digital, analog, and firmware experts to deliver innovative products from specification to silicon validation. You’ll have the opportunity to contribute to high-impact projects and grow your expertise alongside industry leaders.

Rewards and Benefits:

We offer a comprehensive range of health, wellness, and financial benefits to cater to your needs. Our total rewards include both monetary and non-monetary offerings. Your recruiter will provide more details about the salary range and benefits during the hiring process.

------------

9.
About the job
Job Requirements

At Quest Global, it’s not just what we do but how and why we do it that makes us different. With over 25 years as an engineering services provider, we believe in the power of doing things differently to make the impossible possible. Our people are driven by the desire to make the world a better place—to make a positive difference that contributes to a brighter future. We bring together technologies and industries, alongside the contributions of diverse individuals who are empowered by an intentional workplace culture, to solve problems better and faster.

Key Responsibilities

Job Description:10+ Years of experience

Location: Noida

Role

 Extensive experience in Automotive Systems, with deep understanding of technologies, trends and needs
 Extensive experience in defining, developing, and implementing security software, ideally with a strong embedded firmware development background
 Ability to troubleshoot complex issues and debug firmware
 Experience with Agile methodologies and software development lifecycles
 Experience in Functional Safety (ISO 26262).
 Familiar with cybersecurity ISO 21434 ,
 Strong understanding of security standards, security protocols, cryptography.
 Strong understanding of Security Threat modelling and risk analysis and application of countermeasures.
 Strong technical skills with a team first mentality. Strong ability to work cross functionally, across many stakeholders to drive towards common goals and objectives
 Ability to engage with key technical stakeholders at customer to build trust and confidence
 Experience in working with global teams in matrix organizations.

Required Qualifications

 Bachelor’s or Master’s degree in Electronics Engineering, Computer Engineering, or related field with 10 years or more relevant experience.
 Experience with technical analysis and decomposition of customer use-case.
 Proven experience in Microcontroller Architecture, Software, SoC Architecture, or system-level Integration.
 Strong expertise in C programming, Enterprise Architect (UML).
 Strong understanding of security standards, security protocols, cryptography.
 Strong understanding of microprocessor and microcontroller architectures, including CPU cores, DSP, memory management, and peripheral integration.
 Strong collaboration skills to work directly with customers and across multidisciplinary teams, including silicon, software, firmware, board design engineers and program management.
 Experience in Automotive software development processes.

Furthermore, You Are

 Innovator finding break-through solutions for complex automotive problems
 Driving for continuous improvements.

We are known for our extraordinary people who make the impossible possible every day. Questians are driven by hunger, humility, and aspiration. We believe that our company culture is the key to our ability to make a true difference in every industry we reach. Our teams regularly invest time and dedicated effort into internal culture work, ensuring that all voices are heard.

We wholeheartedly believe in the diversity of thought that comes with fostering a culture rooted in respect, where everyone belongs, is valued, and feels inspired to share their ideas. We know embracing our unique differences makes us better, and that solving the worlds hardest engineering problems requires diverse ideas, perspectives, and backgrounds. We shine the brightest when we tap into the many dimensions that thrive across over 21,000 difference-makers in our workplace.



----------

10.
About the job
Job Description

JOB DUTIES:

 Develop software using C / C++ (primarily) 
 Write programs that interact with:
 kernel interfaces 
 system calls 
 device drivers 
 memory management subsystems 
 Build daemons, services, and low-level utilities. 
 Talks directly to the OS Uses kernel services via system calls Manages resources explicitly (memory, CPU, IO) Prioritizes performance, reliability, and determinism 

YOU MUST HAVE:

 Should have at-least 3 -7 years of experience in a reputed organization with 2 years in the position 
 Expert proficiency in C programming, with working knowledge of C++ preferred, and experience using Bash and Python for automation and debugging. 
 Strong Linux system programming knowledge, including process and thread management, virtual memory, low-level I/O, signals, and IPC mechanisms. 
 Hands-on experience with concurrency using POSIX threads (pthreads) and synchronization primitives, with the ability to diagnose race conditions and deadlocks. 
 Proficiency with debugging and performance tools such as gdb, strace, ltrace, perf, valgrind, and core dump analysis. 
 Experience with GCC/Clang toolchains, Makefiles or CMake build systems, and Git-based version control. 
 Solid understanding of TCP/IP fundamentals, Linux socket programming, and event driven I/O models using select, poll, or epoll. 

WE VALUE:

 Deep Systems Thinking 
 Ownership & Accountability 
 Debugging Mindset 
 Code Quality & Reliability 
 Continuous Learning 

What's In It for You:

 Health Insurance Coverage – comprehensive care for you and your family. 
 Employee Assistance Program (EAP) – confidential service which equips and supports you as you meet life’s challenges. 
 Education Assistance – we invest in your growth so you can keep learning and thriving. 
 Maternity & Paternity Leave – because family always comes first. 
 Menstrual Wellness Benefit – benefit for women employees 
 Bereavement Leave – time to be with loved ones when it matters most. 

About Us

Resideo Technologies has announced its intention to spin off ADI Global Distribution and establish it as a separate, publicly traded company. Under this plan, ADI will continue its role as a leading global wholesale distributor serving commercial and residential markets, while Resideo will retain its manufacturing and product-solutions business. Upon separation, both companies will operate independently to better serve their respective markets and customers. The spin-off is currently targeted for completion in the second half of 2026, subject to customary conditions.

Resideo is a $6.76 billion global manufacturer, developer, and distributor of technology-driven sensing and control solutions that help homeowners and businesses stay connected and in control of their comfort, security, energy use, and smart living. We focus on the professional channel, serving over 100,000 contractors, installers, dealers, and integrators across the HVAC, security, fire, electrical, and home comfort markets. Our products are found in more than 150 million residential and commercial spaces worldwide, with tens of millions of new devices sold annually. Trusted brands like Honeywell Home, First Alert, and Resideo power connected living for over 12.8 million customers through our Products & Solutions segment. Our ADI | Snap One segment spans 200+ stocking locations in 17 countries, offering a catalog of over 500,000 products from more than 1,000 manufacturers. With a global team of more than 14,000 employees, we offer the opportunity to make a real impact in a fast-growing, purpose-driven industry. Learn more at www.resideo.com .

At Resideo, we bring together diverse individuals to build the future of homes. Resideo is an equal opportunity employer. Qualified applicants will be considered without regard to age, race, creed, color, national origin, ancestry, marital status, affectional or sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, disability, nationality, sex, religion, or veteran status. For more information on applicable U.S. equal employment regulations, refer to the "EEO is the Law" poster , "EEO is the Law" Supplement Poster and the Pay Transparency Nondiscrimination Provision . Resideo complies with applicable equal employment laws in all countries where we do business. For more information on how we process your information in the job application process, please refer to Recruitment Privacy Notice . If you require a reasonable accommodation to apply for a job, please use Contact Us form for assistance.

JOB INFO 

Job Identification : 17807

Job Category : Firmware Engineering

Posting Date : 2026-02-23T05:15:13+00:00

Job Schedule : Full time

Locations : Embassy Tech Village, Block 7B, 4F, Outer Ring Road, Bangalore, 560103, IN

(On-site)

Incentive Eligible : N/A

Business : Resideo

Hiring Salary Range : At Resideo, we are committed to inclusive and equitable compensation. Salaries are determined by factors like role responsibilities, candidate qualifications, and geographic location. We also provide additional benefits tailored to your location and role.

-----------

11.

About the job
Company Description

Sandiskunderstands how people and businesses consume data and we relentlessly innovate to deliver solutions that enable today’s needs and tomorrow’s next big ideas. With a rich history of groundbreaking innovations in Flash and advanced memory technologies, our solutions have become the beating heart of the digital world we’re living in and that we have the power to shape.

Sandiskmeets people and businesses at the intersection of their aspirations and the moment, enabling them to keep moving and pushing possibilityforward. We do this through the balance of our powerhouse manufacturing capabilities and our industry-leading portfolio of products that are recognized globallyforinnovation, performance and quality.

Sandiskhas two facilities recognized by the World EconomicForum as part of the Global Lighthouse Networkforadvanced 4IR innovations. These facilities were also recognized as Sustainability Lighthousesforbreakthroughs in efficient operations. With our global reach, we ensure the global supply chain has access to the Flash memory it needs to keep our world movingforward.

Job Description

As a Staff Firmware Engineer, you will design, and implement embedded firmware in C for cutting-edge storage solutions, including embedded NAND devices used in smartphones, tablets, and automotive systems. You will be instrumental in shaping the future of high-performance, low-latency storage products.

Key Responsibilities

Design and implement robust firmware modules using C for real-time embedded systems.
Develop and optimize data structures, algorithms, and protocol stacks (e.g., UFS, PCIe, NVMe) for high-throughput storage interfaces.
Collaborate with cross-functional teams across geographies to deliver scalable and maintainable firmware solutions.
Work across simulation environments, FPGA platforms, and final hardware to validate and debug firmware.
Participate in Agile development cycles, leveraging CI/CD pipelines and automated testing frameworks.
Drive innovation and contribute to IP generation through deep technical problem-solving and architectural contributions.
Review system and board level specifications to ensure all FW features, verification, and diagnostic requirements are feasible and properly incorporated
Develop processes to identify embedded system design issues early in the product development lifecycle
Drive issue resolution and product stability to enable predictable and high quality product development

Qualifications

Required Skills and Experience

Bachelor’s or Master’s degree in Computer Science, Software Engineering, Computer Engineering, or Electrical Engineering.
Minimum of 5 years of hands-on experience in embedded firmware development.
Strong programming expertise inC/C++, specifically forRTOS-based embedded systems.
Solid understanding of thefirmware/software development lifecycle.
Proven experience in debugging and optimizing performance of complex embedded systems using a variety of tools and environments.
Strong analytical and problem-solving abilities.
Working knowledge ofNAND flash fundamentals.
Excellent interpersonal skills and a collaborative mindset.
Experience working with cross-functional and geographically distributed teams.
Quick learner with the ability to adapt and implement solutions efficiently.
Ability to manage multiple tasks and meet tight deadlines.
Exceptional communication skills in English—both verbal and written—with the ability to work across cultural and organizational boundaries.

Preferred Qualifications

Direct experience in firmware development forNAND Flash-based products.
Proficiency in scripting and automation usingPython.
Prior contributions topatent filingsorscientific publications.
Demonstrated experience deliveringend-to-end storage stack solutionson cutting-edge or new hardware platforms.

Additional Information

Sandisk thrives on the power and potential of diversity. As a global company, we believe the most effective way to embrace the diversity of our customers and communities is to mirror it from within. We believe the fusion of various perspectives results in the best outcomes for our employees, our company, our customers, and the world around us. We are committed to an inclusive environment where every individual can thrive through a sense of belonging, respect and contribution.

Sandisk is committed to offering opportunities to applicants with disabilities and ensuring all candidates can successfully navigate our careers website and our hiring process. Please contact us atjobs.accommodations@sandisk.comto advise us of your accommodation request. In your email, please include a description of the specific accommodation you are requesting as well as the job title and requisition number of the position for which you are applying.

------------------

12.
About the job
Company Description

Crossware specializes in providing comprehensive software engineering services designed for smart devices and connected ecosystems. With expertise in cross-platform application development using frameworks such as Qt and Android, the company also offers end-to-end MCU development solutions. Services include middleware and multimedia integration, Board Support Package (BSP) development for Linux and Android, along with custom tool creation. Additionally, Crossware supports its clients with dedicated test setups, quality assurance processes, and technology training programs in areas like Qt for MCUs and C++.



Role Description

This is a full-time hybrid role based in India with high flexibility for remote work. The Senior Firmware Engineer will work with a multi-national team on the Qt for MCUs graphics stack. Qt for MCUs is an embedded graphics stack for microcontrollers developed by the Qt company (www.qt.io). The Qt for MCUs stack has an extremely fast adoption in the market across automotive, consumer, medical, and industrial domains. The role involves ensuring that the Qt for MCUs stack works best on any customer-specific hardware and software environment.



Qualifications

1. Strong Embedded systems knowledge: Microcontrollers, toolchains

 2. RTOS experience: FreeRTOS or any other RTOS

 3. Embedded C Programming experience: 4-5 years

 4. Embedded C++ with OOP: 1-2 Years

 5. Good experience in any of these MCU development environments: STM32, NXP, RH850, Cypress(Infineon) Traveo II

 6. Peripheral drivers development based on I2C/SPI/UART/QSPI

 7. Low-level microcontroller development knowledge: Timers, DMA, linker scripts, build tools

 8. Advantage to have:

CMake or any other Makefile-based build system knowledge
Experience on any of these GUI frameworks: TouchGfx/LVGL/QtforMCUs
Scripting experience: Python/Linux Shell scripts

Requirements added by the job poster

• 1+ years of work experience with Embedded C++

----------------

13.
About the job
About Marvell

Marvell’s semiconductor solutions are the essential building blocks of the data infrastructure that connects our world. Across enterprise, cloud and AI, and carrier architectures, our innovative technology is enabling new possibilities.

At Marvell, you can affect the arc of individual lives, lift the trajectory of entire industries, and fuel the transformative potential of tomorrow. For those looking to make their mark on purposeful and enduring innovation, above and beyond fleeting trends, Marvell is a place to thrive, learn, and lead.

Your Team, Your Impact

Marvell is a leading provider of innovative technologies, including ultra-fast read channels, high-performance processors, leading edge transceivers, highly efficient analog designs, and powerful cryptographic engines.

The System software team (Firmware and Kernel) in the MBE BU focuses on developing and integrating key software components that enables use of Octeon series of silicons and custom silicons. These components form a critical subset of the complete software stack, ensuring the silicon's capabilities are effectively utilized. The team's work plays a key role in supporting the broader software ecosystem.

What You Can Expect

In this position, you will be responsible for design, implementation and maintenance of Linux device drivers and debug utilities for ARM64 based SoCs.
Participate in all phases of development and support including architecture, requirements, design, coding, unit testing, benchmarking, and support.
Work closely with the Hardware, Firmware, and internal test teams on resolving issues during unit and integration testing.
Contribute meaningfully to the Linux upstream community and OS distro vendors (such as RedHat and SUSE).

What We're Looking For

Bachelor’s or Master's degree in computer science, Electrical Engineering or related fields with 2 -10 years of related professional experience.
Sound knowledge on ARM64 architecture.
Strong working experience on Kernel internals, device driver development and virtualization concepts.
Hands-on experience working on ARM trusted firmware (ATF).
Knowledge on ARM64 debug and error handling technologies like RAS, synchronous/asynchronous errors, watchdog etc. will be a big plus.
Excellent C programming skills.
Excellent software design, problem-solving, debugging and documentation skills.
Prior hands-on experience on using GDB, logic analyzer, Lauterbach is a plus.
Excellent written and verbal communication skills with the ability to present complex technical information in a clear and concise manner to a variety of audiences.
Ability to work independently with minimal guidance.

Additional Compensation And Benefit Elements

With competitive compensation and great benefits, you will enjoy our workstyle within an environment of shared collaboration, transparency, and inclusivity. We’re dedicated to giving our people the tools and resources they need to succeed in doing work that matters, and to grow and develop with us. For additional information on what it’s like to work at Marvell, visit our Careers page.

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, gender identity, disability or protected veteran status.

Interview Integrity 

To support fair and authentic hiring practices, candidates are not permitted to use AI tools (such as transcription apps, real-time answer generators like ChatGPT or Copilot, or automated note-taking bots) during interviews.

These tools must not be used to record, assist with, or enhance responses in any way. Our interviews are designed to evaluate your individual experience, thought process, and communication skills in real time. Use of AI tools without prior instruction from the interviewer will result in disqualification from the hiring process.

This position may require access to technology and/or software subject to U.S. export control laws and regulations, including the Export Administration Regulations (EAR). As such, applicants must be eligible to access export-controlled information as defined under applicable law. Marvell may be required to obtain export licensing approval from the U.S. Department of Commerce and/or the U.S. Department of State. Except for U.S. citizens, lawful permanent residents, or protected individuals as defined by 8 U.S.C. 1324b(a)(3), all applicants may be subject to an export license review process prior to employment.


__________________________


14.
About the job
You’ll be our: Firmware Application Engineer

You’ll be based at: IBC Knowledge Park, Bengaluru

You’ll be aligned with: Firmware Manager

You’ll be a member of: Firmware Team

What you’ll do at Ather:

A successful candidate is expected to lead the Application Software development and integration for various Ather products and be responsible for realizing System Behaviour as per the Functional and Non-Functional Requirements. Responsibilities include:

Having a clear understanding of expected System behaviour by interacting with different stakeholders and translating these into Software Design. 
Developing Scalable, Maintainable and Efficient Application software within deadlines
Exploring, Evaluating and Integrating Open Source libraries and frameworks appropriate for specific requirements. 
Interacting with the QA team regularly for analyzing/Triaging Issues. 
Designing creative prototypes according to specifications. 
Evaluating existing applications to reprogram, update and add new features
Developing Technical documents and User manuals to accurately represent application design, code, and describe the procedure for operations. 
Identifying and communicating potential risks along with preventive and corrective measures
Designing HW/SW integration while working with HW/Algorithms/Cloud teams to deliver an integrated solution. 

Here’s what we are looking for:

Must have:

Linux / RTOS based Software development experience. 
Experience working in a multithreaded environment and using synchronization techniques. 
Strong Programming acumen, and Debugging Skills. 
Strong knowledge base on evaluating Software performance metrics. 
Experience of Communication Protocols and Automotive standards. 
Experience with static analyser, and JTAG tools. 
Language: C, C++, Shell

Nice to have:

Experience in Microcontroller firmware development. 
Experience with UDS, AutoSAR, ISO26262, MISRA Guidelines 
Previous experience with SIL and HIL Testing as well as Test case generation for the same. 
Hand on experience in using CAN tools & CAPL Scripts, Bus Master
Model Based Development using Matlab/Simulink. 
Experience using messaging Protocols like MQTT, ZeroMQ. 
Experience with Wireless protocols like BT, BLE, and WiFi. 
Language: Go, Python

You bring to Ather:

BE/B.tech is minimum req with minimum 3-5 years of prior industry experience.

-----------------

15.

About the job
Job Description

Are you passionate about making a difference in people's lives through groundbreaking products and services ? Look no further! Protectol Health is a pioneering pharma-tech company with a holistic approach that spans conventional pharmaceuticals, nutraceuticals, nutrients, and business safety. Our dedication to the value of "Life matters" is not just a slogan – it's ingrained in every facet of our work culture and offerings.

With dedicated divisions in Pharma, Technology, Nutraceuticals, Nutriments, and Business Safety, we drive impactful research and development activities that redefine industries and touch lives. Our operational footprint extends across the GCC countries and India, allowing us to reach and transform communities on a grand scale.

If you're enthusiastic about creating a positive impact and wish to be a part of an organization that values and prioritizes lives, Protectol Health welcomes you. Join us in our mission to shape a healthier present and future. Your expertise and passion will find a meaningful home here.

Roles And Responsibilities

As an Embedded Firmware Engineer, you will be responsible for:

Leading the firmware development for our product line of safety and medical devices.
Designing, developing, testing, and maintaining embedded firmware.
Collaborating with cross-functional teams to define software requirements, specifications, and architectures based on product requirements and industry standards.
Implementing firmware solutions that comply with ATEX certification, IEC 61508, and Functional Safety (SIL standards) for devices used in hazardous locations.
Conducting thorough testing and validation of firmware to ensure reliability, accuracy, and compliance with safety standards.
Optimizing firmware for power efficiency and performance to meet the life of portable and battery-powered devices.
Implement firmware algorithms for sensor calibration, data processing, and user interface interactions.
Assisting in hardware-software integration, debugging, and troubleshooting to ensure seamless functionality of the devices.
Collaborating with Quality Assurance and Product Validation teams to ensure the highest quality of firmware deliverables.
Participating in code reviews and providing constructive feedback to improve code quality and maintainability.
Keeping abreast of emerging technologies, industry trends, and advancements in embedded systems for continuous improvement and innovation.

Skills And Qualifications

Bachelor's or Master's degree in Electrical Engineering, Computer Engineering, or related field.
3+ years of experience in embedded firmware development for portable and wireless gas detectors and docking stations.
Proficiency in C/C++ programming languages for embedded systems.
Hands-on experience with a complete product development cycle is an add-on.
Experience with STM32/STM8/ MSP430 or any other low-power microcontrollers for the development of low-powered devices.
Experience in reading and optimizing analog data in various types of ADCs.
Understanding of ATEX certification requirements and compliance.
Understanding and practical experience with Functional Safety standards (SIL2/3 standards) in the development of safety-critical systems is an add-on.
Experience with coding standards. (eg: Misra-C) Familiarity with System architectures and communication protocols like I2C, UART, SPI, etc. Knowledge of sleep modes and low-power optimization techniques for battery-operated devices.
Experience in developing and using custom segment LCDs (TN, STN, etc.) used in battery-powered ultra-low power devices.
Experience with software development tools, version control systems, and bug-tracking systems. Strong analytical and problem-solving skills with attention to detail.
Excellent communication and teamwork skills.
Advantages for individuals who thrive in a startup setting.

Work Culture

At Protectol Health, we prioritize our diverse and talented team. We offer flexible work arrangements and resources for well-being to support our employees' personal and professional growth. By putting people first, we attract and retain top talent and drive innovation toward our mission of improving health and well-being

Skills:- STM, Embedded Systems, Microcontrollers, Firmware development, C++, C, Power Electronics and Industrial engineering

--------------
16.
About the job
Job Requirements

We are seeking a highly skilled Embedded SW Engineer with a strong background in firmware development. The ideal candidate will have hands-on experience designing, developing, and debugging embedded software for secure hardware platforms, and will contribute to the architecture and implementation of security features in embedded products.

 Experience:

5–8 years of experience in embedded systems development.

Strong proficiency in C, with experience in low-level programming.

Hands-on experience with Zephyr RTOS.

Experience with ARM Cortex-M/A, RISC-V, or similar architectures.

Hands-on experience with SPDM, TPM, Secure Boot or OpenSSL implementations is a strong plus.

Experience in debugging embedded code using tools like JTAG

Experience with JIRA test management tool and issue tracking

Experience of working with diverse multi-locational teams in different time zones

Excellent interpersonal, written and verbal communication skills

Excellent communication, problem solving and analytical skills

Self-motivated and a good team player

------------------------------

17.
About the job
Description

Job Title :  Embedded Firmware Test / Test Infrastructure Engineer

Experience : 3 - 6 Years

Location : Bangalore

Education : B.E./B.Tech / M.E./M.Tech in Electronics, Computer Science, or related fields

Job Summary

We are looking for a skilled Embedded Firmware Test / Test Infrastructure Engineer with strong hands-on experience in developing test infrastructure and executing/integrating firmware tests for embedded devices.

The ideal candidate will have solid C programming skills, experience with board-level and driver-level testing, and the ability to build scalable test frameworks.

Key Responsibilities

 Design, develop, and maintain test infrastructure for embedded firmware validation.
 Develop and execute firmware tests at driver, board, and system software levels.
 Integrate firmware test suites into CI/CD or automation environments.
 Develop test frameworks and utilities using C, C++, and Python with Object-Oriented

Programming concepts.

Create Test Cases Based On

 High-Level Requirements (HLR)
 Low-Level Requirements (LLR)
 Test strategies and specifications
 Ensure comprehensive coverage by defining input variations, boundary conditions, and

negative test scenarios.

 Perform integration testing across firmware, drivers, and hardware platforms.
 Analyze test failures, debug firmware issues, and collaborate closely with development teams.
 Document test plans, test cases, results, and defects clearly and effectively.

Required Skills & Qualifications

 3 - 6 years of experience in embedded firmware test development and execution.
 Strong proficiency in C programming (mandatory).
 Hands-on experience in driver-level and board-level system software testing.
 Experience developing test frameworks using : C / C++/Python
 Object-Oriented Programming principles
 Solid understanding of embedded systems testing methodologies.
 Ability to derive test cases from requirements and design documents.
 Experience with debugging tools (JTAG, GDB, logs, trace analysis, etc.).
 Good understanding of embedded firmware build and integration flows.


--------------

18.
About the job
Job Description: Lead Firmware Engineer – AC-DC / DC-DC Power Converters

Role Summary

The Firmware or Embedded Software Lead is responsible for developing, implementing, and validating embedded control software for AC-DC rectifiers, DC-DC converters, on-board/off-board chargers, SMPS, and power conversion systems.

The role focuses on control algorithms, digital control loop development, real-time firmware, protection logic, communication protocols, and hardware bring-up. End to end responsibility of firmware development and functionality.

Key Responsibilities

 Embedded Firmware Development

Develop low-level firmware for digital controllers

TI C2000 (F2803x, F2837x, F28004x, F28x series), ARM Cortex-M microcontrollers, DSP/FPGA

Implement control loops for AC-DC and DC-DC conversion such as Current loop, voltage loop, PFC control (totem Poly, CCM, interleaved), LLC/DC-DC stage control, Soft-start, mode transition, burst modes

Develop firmware for PWM generation, ADC sampling, interrupts, timers.

 Converter Control Algorithms
Design, tune, and validate algorithms for AC-DC PFC control (average, peak, digital), DC-DC resonant/LLC control,– Phase-shifted full bridge, Buck/Boost control, multi-phase interleaving
Implement digital compensators (PI, PID, feed-forward, PR, PLL).
 Protection & Safety Logic
Develop firmware for protections OVP/UVP, OCP, SCP, Over-temperature, Soft-switching protection, Input/output surge and transient protections
Implement fast fault detection and safe shutdown algorithms.
 Hardware Bring-up & Validation
Work with hardware engineers to validate Gate drivers, Power stage behaviour, ADC sensing circuits, Board bring-up and debugging
Perform real-time testing using oscilloscope, power analyser, logic analyser.
 Digital Communication & Interfaces
Should implement the following protocol CAN / CAN open /1939/Modbus/RS485/Ethernet/UART/SPI/ I2C
Should Integrate firmware with cloud/BMS/controllers if required.
 System Integration & Optimization

Ensure firmware meets requirements for Efficiency, Dynamic response, EMI/EMC, compliance, Start-up/shutdown sequencing, Optimize real-time control code for performance and safety.

 Documentation

Prepare firmware architecture, Requirements & design specifications, Test cases & validation reports, Version control

Technical Skills

Strong understanding of power electronics control
Experience in AC-DC and DC-DC converter control firmware.
Hands-on with real-time embedded programming (C, C++).
Experience with digital control libraries (TI DCL, CMSIS DSP).
Understanding of PWM modules, ADC sampling, control timing.
Good debugging skills on real hardware.

Tools

Code Composer Studio (TI), Keil, IAR, STM32Cube.
MATLAB/Simulink (algorithm simulation).
Git, JIRA, SVN.

Qualifications

B.E / B.Tech / M.Tech in Electronics, Electrical, Embedded Systems, Power Electronics.

Experience 10-18 Years

Preferred Experience

Worked on 30+ kW-level converters for EV chargers, ESS, solar inverters, onboard chargers.

Knowledge of automotive ISO 26262, IEC 61800, IEC 61000 standards (preferred).

Exposure to SiC/GaN based systems. Experience with FPGA or RTOS is a plus.


-----------

19.
About the job
Job Description

We are seeking a hands-on Firmware Engineer (Batteries & Electrical Group) to design, implement, and validate embedded firmware for battery management systems (BMS), DC-DC converters, and motor controls. 


Responsibilities

Develop, debug, maintain embedded software in C/C++ for avionics and power electronics systems. 
Work as per system architecture, facilitate HW-SW co-design. 
Read schematics/datasheets; implement & test modules; support HIL/SIL/MIL testing. 
Go through IC / MCU datasheets. Understand functionalities. Evolve state machines to manage necessary SW functionality. 
Debug using Segger / Lauterbach tools. Code profiling, Timing analysis. 
Use Embedded Coder (Matlab/Simulink/Simscape) for model-based workflows. 
Write readable, maintainable C/C++/Python code complying to high level architecture. 
Combine autogenerated code and custom built firmware for use in a single project. 
Test software deployed on the target hardware. 
Maintain readable source code (Git), participate in code reviews, and enforce best practices. 
Support ISO 26262 / DO-178 activities to ensure design assurance for safety-critical software /firmware development.
Collaborate with cross-functional teams for integration & certification.


Tech Skills

Strong proficiency in Embedded C/C++, MCUs & their architecture. 
Hands-on debugging with Segger / Lauterbach. 
Strong grasp of RTOS concepts and real-time systems. 
Knowledge of UART, SPI, I2C, RS-232/485, CAN, ARINC, Ethernet, etc. 
Familiarity with ISO 26262 (ASIL C/D) and/or DO-178 standards. 
Knowledge of data structures & algorithms for embedded efficiency. 
Version control with Git/GitHub/GitLab. 
Working knowledge of Python for scripting & testing. 


Nice to Have

IoT (MQTT), DBMS/SQL, MISRA standards, SafeRTOS, motor control (FOC, SOC, SOH), model-based design, avionics exposure


Preferred Qualification

B.Tech / B.E / M.Tech / M.E in Electrical & Electronics, Computer Science, or related fields. 
3–4 years of experience in BMS, BTMS, IoT, automotive, or aerospace embedded systems.


-----------

20.
About the job
About Marvell

Marvell’s semiconductor solutions are the essential building blocks of the data infrastructure that connects our world. Across enterprise, cloud and AI, and carrier architectures, our innovative technology is enabling new possibilities.

At Marvell, you can affect the arc of individual lives, lift the trajectory of entire industries, and fuel the transformative potential of tomorrow. For those looking to make their mark on purposeful and enduring innovation, above and beyond fleeting trends, Marvell is a place to thrive, learn, and lead.

Your Team, Your Impact

Marvell is a leading provider of innovative technologies, including ultra-fast read channels, high-performance processors, leading edge transceivers, highly efficient analog designs, and powerful cryptographic engines.

The System software team (Firmware and Kernel) in the MBE BU focuses on developing and integrating key software components that enables use of Octeon series of silicons and custom silicons. These components form a critical subset of the complete software stack, ensuring the silicon's capabilities are effectively utilized. The team's work plays a key role in supporting the broader software ecosystem.

What You Can Expect

In this position, you will be responsible for design, implementation and maintenance of Linux device drivers and debug utilities for ARM64 based SoCs.
Participate in all phases of development and support including architecture, requirements, design, coding, unit testing, benchmarking, and support.
Work closely with the Hardware, Firmware, and internal test teams on resolving issues during unit and integration testing.
Contribute meaningfully to the Linux upstream community and OS distro vendors (such as RedHat and SUSE).

What We're Looking For

Bachelor’s or Master's degree in computer science, Electrical Engineering or related fields with 2 -10 years of related professional experience.
Sound knowledge on ARM64 architecture.
Strong working experience on Kernel internals, device driver development and virtualization concepts.
Hands-on experience working on ARM trusted firmware (ATF).
Knowledge on ARM64 debug and error handling technologies like RAS, synchronous/asynchronous errors, watchdog etc. will be a big plus.
Excellent C programming skills.
Excellent software design, problem-solving, debugging and documentation skills.
Prior hands-on experience on using GDB, logic analyzer, Lauterbach is a plus.
Excellent written and verbal communication skills with the ability to present complex technical information in a clear and concise manner to a variety of audiences.
Ability to work independently with minimal guidance.

Additional Compensation And Benefit Elements

With competitive compensation and great benefits, you will enjoy our workstyle within an environment of shared collaboration, transparency, and inclusivity. We’re dedicated to giving our people the tools and resources they need to succeed in doing work that matters, and to grow and develop with us. For additional information on what it’s like to work at Marvell, visit our Careers page.

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, gender identity, disability or protected veteran status.

Interview Integrity 

To support fair and authentic hiring practices, candidates are not permitted to use AI tools (such as transcription apps, real-time answer generators like ChatGPT or Copilot, or automated note-taking bots) during interviews.

These tools must not be used to record, assist with, or enhance responses in any way. Our interviews are designed to evaluate your individual experience, thought process, and communication skills in real time. Use of AI tools without prior instruction from the interviewer will result in disqualification from the hiring process.

This position may require access to technology and/or software subject to U.S. export control laws and regulations, including the Export Administration Regulations (EAR). As such, applicants must be eligible to access export-controlled information as defined under applicable law. Marvell may be required to obtain export licensing approval from the U.S. Department of Commerce and/or the U.S. Department of State. Except for U.S. citizens, lawful permanent residents, or protected individuals as defined by 8 U.S.C. 1324b(a)(3), all applicants may be subject to an export license review process prior to employment.


--------------

21.

About the job
As a Senior Firmware Engineer on the Wearables Core OS Team, you will play a key role in designing, developing, and optimizing firmware and operating system components for Meta’s wearable devices. Your primary focus will be on building robust firmware features and system-level components that directly interact with hardware. You will collaborate closely with hardware, embedded software, and product teams to deliver secure, high-performance solutions that enable next-generation immersive experiences.

CoreOS Firmware Engineer Responsibilities:

Design, implement, and maintain core firmware and OS components for wearable devices, focusing on hardware integration and system-level functionality
Collaborate with hardware, embedded software, and product teams to integrate new features and optimize end-to-end system performance
Drive investigation and resolution of complex issues related to firmware and device-hardware communication
Ensure high code quality through code reviews, automated testing, and monitoring
Document technical designs, implementation details, and best practices for internal teams
Champion efforts to reduce technical debt and improve system maintainability
Stay current with industry trends and emerging technologies in firmware, embedded OS, and device management

Minimum Qualifications:

Bachelor’s degree or equivalent experience in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, Electrical Engineering, or a related technical field
7+ years of experience in software development, with a focus on firmware, embedded systems, or OS components
Proven experience designing and implementing firmware features and device management
Demonstrated programming skills in C/C++ and experience with embedded development environments
Deep understanding of hardware-software integration and system-level debugging
Experience collaborating with cross-functional teams to deliver complex system software
Demonstrated analytical, debugging, and problem-solving skills

Preferred Qualifications:

Experience with wearable device firmware and embedded OS frameworks
Familiarity with Android OS internals, embedded Linux, or RTOS development
Proficiency in additional programming or scripting languages such as Shell, Rust, or Python
Demonstrated ability to lead large-scale projects from concept to production
Demonstrated communication and documentation skills

About Meta:

Meta builds technologies that help people connect, find communities, and grow businesses. When Facebook launched in 2004, it changed the way people connect. Apps like Messenger, Instagram and WhatsApp further empowered billions around the world. Now, Meta is moving beyond 2D screens toward immersive experiences like augmented and virtual reality to help build the next evolution in social technology. People who choose to build their careers by building with us at Meta help shape a future that will take us beyond what digital connection makes possible today—beyond the constraints of screens, the limits of distance, and even the rules of physics.

Individual compensation is determined by skills, qualifications, experience, and location. Compensation details listed in this posting reflect the base hourly rate, monthly rate, or annual salary only, and do not include bonus, equity or sales incentives, if applicable. In addition to base compensation, Meta offers benefits. Learn more about  benefits  at Meta.


------------
22.
About the job
Job Description

JOB DUTIES:

Strong embedded wireless domain & deep protocol firmware experience in Sub-GHz and 2.4GHz ISM bands. 
Hands-on wireless protocol design & development experience using 802.15.4, ZigBee, Bluetooth/Low Energy. 
Wireless protocol porting, enhancements to support customer requirements and project CTQs. 
Relevant hardware-software co-design experience and understands the basics of RF, transceivers, standards & regulatory requirements. 
Power estimation and Timing analysis of battery-operated devices. Hands on debugging skills using TI, Wireshark, Ubiqua, Perytons Sniffers etc. 
Understands system & product architecture and requirements and proficient in design from the embedded system challenges with ownership. 
Work on device drivers, bootloaders, BSP, and middleware. 
High level programming languages like C, Embedded C, RTOSes like ThreadX, Linux and RF SOCs from TI, Atmel, NXP/Freescale, Ember, Broadcom etc. 
Must be good at independent handling of technical tasks with least supervisor involvement and ability to quickly adapt to changes in requirements. 
Experience in in-depth analysis, troubleshooting & closure of issues. 
Excellent communication and presentation skills

YOU MUST HAVE:

Strong programming skills in C/C++;. 
Experience with RTOS and Embedded Linux. 
Hands-on experience in wireless protocol stacks and debugging tools. 
Should have worked on 2-3 complete product development with firmware design & development. 
Lead design and development of embedded software for connected devices. 
Drive architecture decisions for embedded and wireless solutions. 
Provide technical mentorship to engineers and review designs/code. 

WE VALUE:

Domain knowledge of home automation, Security, Fire and/or Intrusion will be a plus. 
Wireless technologies like Thread, Low Power WiFi, IoT frameworks will be a plus. 
Experience with IoT platforms and cloud integration. 

WHAT'S IN IT FOR YOU:

Hands-on experience with advanced wireless protocols and modern embedded platforms. 
Opportunity to influence system architecture and technical decisions. 
Continuous learning through challenging engineering problems. 
Health Insurance Coverage – comprehensive care for you and your family. 
Employee Assistance Program (EAP) – confidential service which equips and supports you as you meet life’s challenges. 
Education Assistance – we invest in your growth so you can keep learning and thriving. 
Maternity & Paternity Leave – because family always comes first. 
Menstrual Wellness Benefit – benefit for women employees
Bereavement Leave – time to be with loved ones when it matters most. 

About Us

Resideo Technologies has announced its intention to spin off ADI Global Distribution and establish it as a separate, publicly traded company. Under this plan, ADI will continue its role as a leading global wholesale distributor serving commercial and residential markets, while Resideo will retain its manufacturing and product-solutions business. Upon separation, both companies will operate independently to better serve their respective markets and customers. The spin-off is currently targeted for completion in the second half of 2026, subject to customary conditions.

Resideo is a $6.76 billion global manufacturer, developer, and distributor of technology-driven sensing and control solutions that help homeowners and businesses stay connected and in control of their comfort, security, energy use, and smart living. We focus on the professional channel, serving over 100,000 contractors, installers, dealers, and integrators across the HVAC, security, fire, electrical, and home comfort markets. Our products are found in more than 150 million residential and commercial spaces worldwide, with tens of millions of new devices sold annually. Trusted brands like Honeywell Home, First Alert, and Resideo power connected living for over 12.8 million customers through our Products & Solutions segment. Our ADI | Snap One segment spans 200+ stocking locations in 17 countries, offering a catalog of over 500,000 products from more than 1,000 manufacturers. With a global team of more than 14,000 employees, we offer the opportunity to make a real impact in a fast-growing, purpose-driven industry. Learn more at www.resideo.com .

At Resideo, we bring together diverse individuals to build the future of homes. Resideo is an equal opportunity employer. Qualified applicants will be considered without regard to age, race, creed, color, national origin, ancestry, marital status, affectional or sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, disability, nationality, sex, religion, or veteran status. For more information on applicable U.S. equal employment regulations, refer to the "EEO is the Law" poster , "EEO is the Law" Supplement Poster and the Pay Transparency Nondiscrimination Provision . Resideo complies with applicable equal employment laws in all countries where we do business. For more information on how we process your information in the job application process, please refer to Recruitment Privacy Notice . If you require a reasonable accommodation to apply for a job, please use Contact Us form for assistance.

JOB INFO 

Job Identification : 17808

Job Category : Firmware Engineering

Posting Date : 2026-02-17T04:27:04+00:00

Job Schedule : Full time

Locations : Embassy Tech Village, Block 7B, 4F, Outer Ring Road, Bangalore, 560103, IN

(On-site)

Incentive Eligible : N/A

Business : Resideo

Hiring Salary Range : At Resideo, we are committed to inclusive and equitable compensation. Salaries are determined by factors like role responsibilities, candidate qualifications, and geographic location. We also provide additional benefits tailored to your location and role.

Approved Requisition : Yes

--------------

23.
About the job
Cadence® IP solutions will change the way you think about and use IP in your system-on-chip (SoC) designs. As you use more IP to fortify your SoCs with new functionalities, we can help you reduce the complexity and risk inherent in designing for smart technology while meeting your performance, area, and power (PPA) requirements. 

Cadence is the fastest-growing silicon IP provider, with a proven portfolio and many industry firsts in design IP and verification IP. Engineers choose Cadence when they want the best in interface, memory, analog, peripherals, processor, and verification IP. 

POSITION DETAILS



Lead Firmware Engineer 



This is an opportunity to join a dynamic and growing team of experienced engineers developing physical layer IP’s for industry-standard high-speed serial-link protocols. The successful candidate will ideally be a highly motivated self-starter who can work independently to complete assigned tasks and collaborate with other members to achieve project milestones. It is expected that the candidate will contribute during all phases of firmware development for high speed SERDES - from architecture development to implementation, verification, testing and customer deployment. 



Responsibilities

Work closely with PHY digital and mixed signal architects to figure out the details of FW functions and sequences. Contribute during firmware architecture development and implementation of the defined firmware features.
Help to build system level prototype control software to develop/validate adaptation, equalization, and control algorithms for high speed SERDES.
Implement assigned FW features and work closely with verification[simulation] and validation team to ensure the functionality and robustness of the implemented features. 
Support FuSa compliant firmware development. Work closely with verification and validation team to develop and execute test plans for FuSa compliant firmware.
Support of Validation team during electrical and system characterization during post-silicon testing. Identify any FW and HW related functionality and performance issues and implement any necessary FW improvements to address these issues.
Support Product Engineering, System Validation and Design team to debug IP issues during customer deployment of the IP and provide hot fixes.
Create and maintain comprehensive documentation related to firmware design, development, bug fixes and compliance testing. 




Desired Skills

B.Tech with 5yrsor M.Tech with 4 yrs in Electrical/Electronics Engineering
Solid programming knowledge in C/C++ and Python 
Strong problem-solving and communication skills 
Understanding of wireline communication principles and digital signal processing techniques is a plus
Knowledge in mixed signal circuit design is a plus
Experience with silicon validation process and debug is a plus
Experience with digital verification environment and tools is a plus
Understanding of FuSa compliance is a plus


if Interested Please share your updated profile to dsupriya@cadence.com

-------------

24.
About the job
You will be working in the Secure Power Business Division within Schneider Electric to develop systems

and platforms that allow secure power products to be monitored and configured by the customer over the

customers network. The systems will also need to integrate into existing Schneider Electric on premise

and cloud based solutions.

Key Tasks And Responsibilities

 Develops firmware for new and existing company products both within teams and on their own.
 Assists in formulating customer requirements.
 Help in the design and architecture of product solutions as well as creating engineering documents.
 Contributes to continuous improvement of products and processes.
 Works with Technical Support on customer issues.
 Participates in code inspections.
 Understands new technologies and has a good ability and interest in learning. Understands how

these technologies impact our work.

 Mentors junior staff.
 Some international travel will be required from time to time (1-2 weeks per year)

Minimum Education

A B.Sc or B.Eng degree in Computer Science or Software Engineering (or equivalent)

What qualifications will make you successful for this role?

Experience Required
 5+ years of experience in a professional environment working on application development
 5+ years of experience programming in C

Job Advertisement –Senior firmware Engineer October 2025

 Developing embedded applications for Linux or RTOS based systems.
 Proven ability to work with embedded hardware platforms and debuggers.
 Knowledge of TCP/IP networks and application-level protocols such as SNMP, Modbus and BACnet.
 Track record of using AI tools effectively in developing embedded systems.
 Experience in developing embedded AI agents.
 Knowledge on Secure Development Lifecycle practices.
 Creating software design using UML or other software design practices.
 Eagerness to learn and take ownership of hands-on projects.
 Proven track record of delivering quality solutions and/or products.
 Good team building and communication skills.
 Demonstrated ability to provide estimates to a project manager for work undertaken.
 Proven to be adaptable and able to work on a variety of activities simultaneously.
 Shows understanding and appreciation of processes and issues relevant to the job.
 Ability to work on vague as well as concrete tasks independently.
 Eagerness to learn about business and technology trends.
 Knowledge of analysis techniques - can break down complex tasks easily.
 Demonstrated creativity in their solutions.
 Take calculated risks on a daily basis.
 Demonstrated ability to innovate in their work.

Experience Desired

 Experience with embedded web frameworks
 Experience with webservices and API design.
 Working with hardware debuggers.
 Working knowledge of ARM based CPU’s
 Working with IOT protocols.
 Experience with using AI and some experience creating embedded AI agents.

Knowledge and Skills

Required Skills

Programming Language: C

WE OFFER

 Development opportunities for employees who can and are willing to take on more responsibility.
 Generous benefits package including private medical insurance, company pension contributions, and

support in formal educational development.

Schneider

Let us learn about you! Apply today.

You must submit an online application to be considered for any position with us. This position will be posted until filled.

Looking to make an IMPACT with your career?

When you are thinking about joining a new team, culture matters. At Schneider Electric, our values and behaviors are the foundation for creating a great culture to support business success. We believe that our IMPACT values – Inclusion, Mastery, Purpose, Action, Curiosity, Teamwork – starts with us.

IMPACT is also your invitation to join Schneider Electric where you can contribute to turning sustainability ambition into actions, no matter what role you play. It is a call to connect your career with the ambition of achieving a more resilient, efficient, and sustainable world.

We are looking for IMPACT Makers; exceptional people who turn sustainability ambitions into actions at the intersection of automation, electrification, and digitization. We celebrate IMPACT Makers and believe everyone has the potential to be one.

Become an IMPACT Maker with Schneider Electric – apply today!

€36 billion global revenue

+13% organic growth

150 000+ employees in 100+ countries

#1 on the Global 100 World’s most sustainable corporations

You must submit an online application to be considered for any position with us. This position will be posted until filled.

Schneider Electric aspires to be the most inclusive and caring company in the world, by providing equitable opportunities to everyone, everywhere, and ensuring all employees feel uniquely valued and safe to contribute their best. We mirror the diversity of the communities in which we operate, and ‘inclusion’ is one of our core values. We believe our differences make us stronger as a company and as individuals and we are committed to championing inclusivity in everything we do. 

At Schneider Electric, we uphold the highest standards of ethics and compliance, and we believe that trust is a foundational value. Our Trust Charter is our Code of Conduct and demonstrates our commitment to ethics, safety, sustainability, quality and cybersecurity, underpinning every aspect of our business and our willingness to behave and respond respectfully and in good faith to all our stakeholders. You can find out more about our Trust Charter here

Schneider Electric is an Equal Opportunity Employer. It is our policy to provide equal employment and advancement opportunities in the areas of recruiting, hiring, training, transferring, and promoting all qualified individuals regardless of race, religion, color, gender, disability, national origin, ancestry, age, military status, sexual orientation, marital status, or any other legally protected characteristic or conduct.


-----------

25.
Job description
Role: Firmware Engineer

Experience: 3 to 5 years

Location: Bangalore

Notice: Immediate or Less then 30 Days


Must Have: Embedded Systems, C++/Python, Nvidia


Suitable please share your resumes to kiran.k@utthunga.com


Roles & Responsibilities

Embedded firmware development in C/C++ on Linux
Yocto/Linux build familiarity and basic driver understanding
GPU fundamentals (NVIDIA Jetson, CUDA basics, driver interfacing)
Debugging tools and techniques (gdb, strace, tcpdump, logic analyzers)
Working with hardware interfaces (SPI, I2C, UART, GPIO)
Networking basics and communication protocol awareness
Feature implementation, issue resolution, and integration tasks
Firmware validation, testing, and documentation
Collaboration with hardware, system, and application teams
Ability to analyze and troubleshoot complex system behaviors


Role: Firmware Developer
Industry Type: Oil & Gas
Department: Engineering - Hardware & Networks
Employment Type: Full Time, Permanent
Role Category: Hardware
Education
UG: B.Tech/B.E. - Bachelor of Technology / Engineering in Any Specialization
PG: M.Tech in Any Specialization, MS/M.Sc(Science) in Any Specialization, MCA in Any Specialization
Key Skills
Skills highlighted with ‘‘ are preferred keyskills
C++nvidiaCuda
Gpu CudaPython

--------------
26.
Job description

Department: Firmware
Reporting: Senior Firmware Engineer


DESCRIPTION
Takumi Motion Controls is Startup based out of Bangalore, India. Our focus in India is delivering EV Powertrain Solutions to Our Customers in Collaboration with our Japanese Peers.

Upholding the Vision of Innovate in India with Japanese Technology , We are developing Vehicle Powertrain Solutions (Motor controller, vehicle controller etc.,) for Electric Vehicles that will cater to selected segments in the Indian Market. With Localized design and In House Manufacturing of Solutions we strive to enable the Small Electric Vehicle Eco System.


Key Responsibilities
The responsibilities of the Firmware Engineer will include the full life cycle of design, development, modification, testing, debugging, and support for new and existing firmware for all types of motion control applications.
The details of the responsibilities are as below.
Firmware & Associated Hardware DEvelopment:
Define the hardware and software architecture for motor control applications
Design the Application firmware architecture like, flow-charts, interaction & State transition diagram
Design, implement, test and validate control algorithms in C
Hardware
Ability to read hardware schematic
Based on the need prepare Schematics, BOM, on tools like Altium/Pads
Application Software Development
Develop debug and configuration application
Develop Manufacturing test application
Testing & Validation
Incorporate software verification activities including specification reviews, design reviews, code reviews, integration tests, HW/SW interface debugging
Define and execute test plans, with a focus on test-automation
Work on internal and external customer sign-off
Configuration management & others
Adhere to the coding rules and guidelines (be a champion)
Define and ensure strict discipline on folder structure management
Version control and release management
Learning & Development:
L&D is linked to the organizational capability and success
Organization capability requirement is mapped working along with various functional teams
A continuous L&D program (calendar) is created to assist Organization s capability
Build a network of external partners working along with functional teams
L&D calendar is executed with both internal and external partners
Who Can Apply:
Anyone who is extremely passionate, and is confident of learning some/all of the above


EDUCATION AND EXPERTISE
Degree or Equivalent Experience : Master s or Bachelor s degree in Engineering
Years of Experience : 0 to 3 years
Must have
Passion to make this a little bit world better
Team Player- be able to work with cross functional teams
Self-starter Need to drive the projects end-to-end through self-initiative
Customer facing Bring in empathy towards the customer s issue and solve them
Good to have (you will learn)
Proficient in Embedded Systems & C programming
Knowledge of strong development with 8-bit, 16-bit, 32-bit microcontrollers, its peripherals
Experience working with communication protocols like UART, SPI, I2C, I2S, and CAN
Experience with RTOS
Basic theoretical understanding of Sensor and Sensor-less Motor Control design approaches along with know-how of Control schemes like FOC, SVPWM, Field weakening etc.,
Understanding of Model Based Design approach with MATLAB
Knowledge of Functional Safety requirement as per ISO26262
Experience with version control systems
Role: Post Silicon Test Engineer
Industry Type: Industrial Automation
Department: Engineering - Software & QA
Employment Type: Full Time, Permanent
Role Category: Quality Assurance and Testing
Education
UG: Any Graduate
PG: Any Postgraduate
Key Skills
RTOSPowertrainCommunication protocolsCodingConfiguration managementHTMLFirmwareMATLABSPIJapanese


----------

27.
Job description
Job Description

We are seeking a hands-on Firmware Engineer (Batteries & Electrical Group) to design, implement, and validate embedded firmware for battery management systems (BMS), DC-DC converters, and motor controls.

Responsibilities

Develop, debug, maintain embedded software in C/C++ for avionics and power electronics systems.
Work as per system architecture, facilitate HW-SW co-design.
Read schematics/datasheets; implement & test modules; support HIL/SIL/MIL testing.
Go through IC / MCU datasheets. Understand functionalities. Evolve state machines to manage necessary SW functionality.
Debug using Segger / Lauterbach tools. Code profiling, Timing analysis.
Use Embedded Coder (Matlab/Simulink/Simscape) for model-based workflows.
Write readable, maintainable C/C++/Python code complying to high level architecture.
Combine autogenerated code and custom built firmware for use in a single project.
Test software deployed on the target hardware.
Maintain readable source code (Git), participate in code reviews, and enforce best practices.
Support ISO 26262 / DO-178 activities to ensure design assurance for safety-critical software /firmware development.
Collaborate with cross-functional teams for integration & certification.

Tech Skills

Strong proficiency in Embedded C/C++, MCUs & their architecture.
Hands-on debugging with Segger / Lauterbach.
Strong grasp of RTOS concepts and real-time systems.
Knowledge of UART, SPI, I2C, RS-232/485, CAN, ARINC, Ethernet, etc.
Familiarity with ISO 26262 (ASIL C/D) and/or DO-178 standards.
Knowledge of data structures & algorithms for embedded efficiency.
Version control with Git/GitHub/GitLab.
Working knowledge of Python for scripting & testing.

Nice to Have

IoT (MQTT), DBMS/SQL, MISRA standards, SafeRTOS, motor control (FOC, SOC, SOH), model-based design, avionics exposure



Preferred Qualification

B.Tech / B.E / M.Tech / M.E in Electrical & Electronics, Computer Science, or related fields.
3 4 years of experience in BMS, BTMS, IoT, automotive, or aerospace embedded systems.

Job Location
Thaiyur



Role: Post Silicon Test Engineer
Industry Type: Aviation
Department: Engineering - Software & QA
Employment Type: Full Time, Permanent
Role Category: Quality Assurance and Testing
Education
UG: Any Graduate
PG: Any Postgraduate
Key Skills
System architectureC++ISOSOCEthernetData structuresMATLABSQLPythonEmbedded software


-----------------

28.
Job description
Please Note:
1. If you are a first time user, please create your candidate login account before you apply for a job. (Click Sign In > Create Account)
2. If you already have a Candidate Account, please Sign-In before you apply.
Job Description:
Description
Should hold Bachelors or a higher degree in Computer Science, Information Technology or Electronic Communication Engineering with 10+ years of relevant experience in Storage and Embedded Firmware
Strong C and ARM Assembly programming with excellent debugging skills. Expertise in scripting language like Python should be an added advantage
Need to have extensive knowledge of Storage Protocols, OS Concepts (Multi Threading and Multi Process) and ARM processors architecture. With hands on experience on ARM compilers and linkers
Ability to analyze and fix complex problems independently and multitask. Also be able to demonstrate Strong technical leadership through in-depth understanding of architecture and design of Storage adapters running on Fiber Channel protocol
Must possess good Oral, Written and Listening skills
Need to be a good team player, and work coherently with teammates in building complex solution
Should be Energetic, Creative, Self-Motivated and willing to work on highly complex ideas on own. Should have a Can Do Attitude
Responsibilities
Will be a member of Firmware Development team, working on cutting edge Storage Adapters
Shall be contributing to Existing and New critical components for Broadcom Storage Adapter solution
Own Firmware modules that are implemented on Storage adapters. Will write code that handles IO/Data and Control path for Fiber Channel protocol, running on ARM processors
Need to be able to deliver on assigned tasks in a timely fashion, and with high quality
Support existing products to customers by timely & high quality resolution of defects
.
Role: Hardware Platform Engineer
Industry Type: Software Product
Department: Engineering - Hardware & Networks
Employment Type: Full Time, Permanent
Role Category: Hardware
Education
UG: Any Graduate
PG: Any Postgraduate
Key Skills
Computer scienceMultithreadingArchitectureDebuggingFirmware developmentTechnical leadershipFirmwareARMInformation technologyPython


-------

29.

Job description
Sigtech Wireless Technologies Pvt Ltd is looking for Firmware Engineer Firmware Development: Design, develop, test, and debug firmware code for embedded systems or devices. This includes writing efficient and reliable code to control the hardware and implement required functionalities.Embedded Systems Design: Work closely with hardware engineers to define system requirements, select appropriate microcontrollers or microprocessors, and design the overall architecture of the embedded system.

Firmware Optimization : Optimize firmware code for performance, memory usage, and power consumption. Employ techniques such as code profiling and debugging to identify and address bottlenecks or issues.Integration and Testing: Integrate firmware with the hardware components and perform rigorous testing to ensure proper functionality and adherence to specifications. This may involve developing test plans, conducting unit testing, and participating in system-level testing.Documentation: Create and maintain detailed documentation including design specifications, user manuals, and technical reports.

 Document firmware code and version control processes to ensure traceability and ease of maintenance.Collaboration: Collaborate with cross-functional teams, including hardware engineers, software engineers, quality assurance engineers, and product managers, to ensure seamless integration of firmware with other system components.Debugging and Troubleshooting: Investigate and resolve firmware-related issues reported by internal or external stakeholders. Use tools such as oscilloscopes, logic analyzers, and debuggers to diagnose and fix problems.

Qualifications: Education: A bachelor's or higher degree in Electrical Engineering, Computer Engineering, Computer Science, or a related field is typically required. Relevant certifications or additional training in embedded systems and firmware development are beneficial.Programming Skills: Proficiency in low-level programming languages such as C or C++ is essential. Knowledge of assembly language and familiarity with embedded systems development environments and tools (e.g., IDEs, compilers) is highly desirable.Embedded Systems Knowledge: Strong understanding of embedded systems architecture, microcontrollers / microprocessors , and real-time operating systems (RTOS). Experience with hardware interfaces, such as UART, SPI, I2C, and peripherals (e.g., sensors, actuators), is important.Firmware Development Experience: Prior experience in firmware development for embedded systems is typically required. Demonstrated ability to design and implement efficient firmware solutions, debug complex issues, and optimize code for performance and memory usage is valuable.

Role: Back End Developer
Industry Type: Telecom / ISP
Department: Engineering - Software & QA
Employment Type: Full Time, Permanent
Role Category: Software Development
Education
UG: Any Graduate
PG: Any Postgraduate
Key Skills
assembly languageCJavaScriptHTML.NETOraclefirmwarePythonSQL

----------
30.
Job Description

At Boeing, we innovate and collaborate to make the world a better place. We’re committed to fostering an environment for every teammate that’s welcoming, respectful and inclusive, with great opportunity for professional growth. Find your future with us.

Millennium Space Systems, a part of Boeing Defense, Space and Security (BDS), is a fast, agile small satellite company focused on national security space. Our missions have direct impact to global security, like missile warning and Earth observation.

Our team is curious, bold and innovative. We take risks, innovate and explore new techniques and technologies. We influence change because we challenge the status quo. And when we watch our satellites launch, we know each one of us made it happen.

Job Summary

As the Spacecraft Firmware Manager, you will lead the company’s Spacecraft Firmware team and serve as a point of contact for technical, budget and resource allocation issues to meet team members needs, customer requirements, and company goals.

You will also contribute to our codebase by providing technical guidance on code reviews and some direct development.

This position's internal job code is Software Engineering Manager. Our team is currently hiring for level K.

Position Responsibilities:

Responsibilities:

People (25%)

Conduct interviews and screen interview candidates

Mentor the team and motivate them to succeed

Provide new hire reviews and semi-annual performance reviews

Recommend promotions and raises

Plan team development and set goals

Represent the team, advocate for it, and ensure it has proper resources

Foster Millennium’s commitment to a culture of inclusivity

Programmatic (25%)

Break down and define scope of work

Staff appropriately for present and future programs

Allocate staff across programs based on priority

Track team status toward completing work and regularly evaluate performance

Technical (50%)

Help guide Field Programmable Gate Array (FPGA) architecture and implementation for flight programs

Coordinate design reuse across programs and tasks with different needs and constraints

Foster good technical communication and working relationships between the team and other – subsystems

Interface with external hardware and software suppliers

Review designs and code, ensuring team standards are met

Improve process by simplifying workflows, automating repetitive tasks, and finding smarter ways to work

Develop and document best practices for producing and testing firmware

Break down boundaries to develop and maintain each individual’s familiarity with the whole team’s work

Seek new industry knowledge and techniques to enhance team capabilities

Generate and improve documentation

This position is expected to be 100% onsite. The selected candidate will be required to work onsite at one of the listed location options. 

Security Clearance and Export Control Requirements

This position must meet Export Control compliance requirements, therefore a “US Person” as defined by 22 C.F.R. § 120.15 is required. “US Person” includes US Citizen, lawful permanent resident, refugee, or asylee.

Basic Qualifications (Required Skills/Experience):

Degree in Electrical, Computer, or other relevant engineering

Strong proficiency with hand-written synthesizable SystemVerilog

Strong proficiency with common version control, defect/task tracking, and documentation systems

At least 4 years developing FPGA/ASIC systems

At least 2 years as an Responsible Engineer, Project Lead, IPT Lead, or equivalent

Must be versatile and able to perform and manage multiple tasks concurrently

Preferred Qualifications (Desired Skills/Experience):

Ability to obtain TS/SCI clearance

At least 6 years developing FPGA/ASIC systems for space environments

At least 2 years experience as a functional manager or manager in a matrix organization

Conflict of Interest:

Successful candidates for this job must satisfy the Company’s Conflict of Interest (COI) assessment process

Drug Free Workplace:

Millennium Space Systems, a Boeing Company, is a Drug Free Workplace (DFW) where post offer applicants and employees are subject to testing for marijuana, cocaine, opioids, amphetamines, PCP, and alcohol when criteria is met as outlined in our policies.

Shift:

This role will be on 1st Shift

Total Rewards:

At Millennium Space Systems, a Boeing Company, we strive to deliver a Total Rewards package that will attract, engage and retain the top talent.  Elements of the Total Rewards package include competitive base pay and variable compensation opportunities.  

Millennium Space Systems also provides eligible employees with an opportunity to enroll in a variety of benefit programs, generally including health insurance, flexible spending accounts, health savings accounts, retirement savings plans, life and disability insurance programs, and a number of programs that provide for both paid and unpaid time away from work.  

The specific programs and options available to any given employee may vary depending on eligibility factors such as geographic location, date of hire, and the applicability of collective bargaining agreements.

Pay is based upon candidate experience and qualifications, as well as market and business considerations.

Summary Pay Range:

Level K: $142,000 - 253,000

Millennium is DDTC-registered, ITAR-compliant Company. This position is located at a facility that requires special access. Applicants MUST be U.S. citizens and eligible for a security clearance. Additionally, applicants must be willing to apply for and maintain a security clearance. We encourage all interested candidates to apply for any open position for which they feel they are qualified.

Applications for this position will be accepted until Mar. 20, 2026

Export Control Requirements:

This position must meet U.S. export control compliance requirements. To meet U.S. export control compliance requirements, a “U.S. Person” as defined by 22 C.F.R. §120.62 is required. “U.S. Person” includes U.S. Citizen, U.S. National, lawful permanent resident, refugee, or asylee.

Export Control Details:

US based job, US Person required

Education

Bachelor's Degree or Equivalent Required

Relocation

Relocation assistance is not a negotiable benefit for this position.

Visa Sponsorship

Employer will not sponsor applicants for employment visa status.

Shift

This position is for 1st shift

Equal Opportunity Employer:

Boeing is an Equal Opportunity Employer. Employment decisions are made without regard to race, color, religion, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, age, physical or mental disability, genetic factors, military/veteran status or other characteristics protected by law.


---------

31.
Job Title: Firmware EngineerJob Description
We are seeking a skilled Firmware Engineer to ensure the correct development of firmware by checking suppliers' engineering deliverables. You will be responsible for troubleshooting supplier work, assisting in the development of firmware for new product development, and utilizing C/C++ for embedded system design. Your role will involve the design, development, testing, and integration of complex embedded hardware and software systems. Additionally, you will manage outside suppliers and manufacturers concerning system and project-level activities.

Responsibilities
Check suppliers' engineering deliverables to ensure accuracy in firmware development.
Troubleshoot supplier work as needed to assist in firmware development for new products.
Utilize C/C++ for embedded system design.
Design, develop, test, and integrate complex embedded hardware and software systems.
Manage outside suppliers and manufacturers related to system and project-level activities.
Essential Skills
8+ years of experience in firmware engineering.
Proficiency in C/C++ for embedded system development.
Experience working with third-party engineering firms.
Understanding of analog and digital domains.
Experience with simulation software such as Matlab, Simulink, or PSpice.
Familiarity with Altium or other electronic CAD tools.
BS in Electrical, Computer, or Electronic Engineering.
Additional Skills & Qualifications
Experience in embedded systems and electronics design.
Knowledge of microcontrollers and hardware.
Work Environment
You will be part of a team of five engineers, acting as the sole firmware expert, responsible for your duties with minimal assistance. The position offers a hybrid work environment with three days onsite and two days remote, providing flexibility.

Job Type & Location
This is a Contract to Hire position based out of Houston, TX.

Pay and Benefits
The pay range for this position is $55.00 - $65.00/hr.

Eligibility requirements apply to some benefits and may depend on your job classification and length of employment. Benefits are subject to change and may be subject to specific elections, plan, or program terms. If eligible, the benefits available for this temporary role may include the following: • Medical, dental & vision • Critical Illness, Accident, and Hospital • 401(k) Retirement Plan – Pre-tax and Roth post-tax contributions available • Life Insurance (Voluntary Life & AD&D for the employee and dependents) • Short and long-term disability • Health Spending Account (HSA) • Transportation benefits • Employee Assistance Program • Time Off/Leave (PTO, Vacation or Sick Leave)

Workplace Type
This is a hybrid position in Houston,TX.

Application Deadline
This position is anticipated to close on Mar 13, 2026.

About Actalent
Actalent is a global leader in engineering and sciences services and talent solutions. We help visionary companies advance their engineering and science initiatives through access to specialized experts who drive scale, innovation and speed to market. With a network of almost 30,000 consultants and more than 4,500 clients across the U.S., Canada, Asia and Europe, Actalent serves many of the Fortune 500.

The company is an equal opportunity employer and will consider all applications without regard to race, sex, age, color, religion, national origin, veteran status, disability, sexual orientation, gender identity, genetic information or any characteristic protected by law.

If you would like to request a reasonable accommodation, such as the modification or adjustment of the job application process or interviewing due to a disability, please email actalentaccommodation@actalentservices.com for other accommodation options.
----------------

32.
About the job
GalaxEye aims to shape the future of Satellite Image Acquisition, providing the most meaningful datasets, thus helping businesses and governments make data-driven decisions based on insights from satellite imagery. We will provide Satellite Imagery Datasets and Value-added services to Geospatial Analytics Companies and Infrastructure enterprises. 

At GalaxEye, we are working to build the best remote sensing satellites and also, we are researching various aspects of remote sensing.

As a part of the Embedded Systems Team, you will be the backbone of every electrical and electronic system like Electrical Power Systems, Data Acquisition Boards, On-Board Computer etc. This position requires someone comfortable with all aspects of embedded firmware development, thrives in a wide-ranging multi-functional organisation, is not afraid to debate ideas openly, and is flexible enough to shift on constantly evolving requirements.


Responsibilities

• Understand system and functional requirements, and translate them into detailed software requirements.

• Design and implement algorithms with acute optimisation for CPU cycles and memory utilisation while meeting rigid real-time deadlines.

• Develop software/firmware from scratch, ensuring highly modular, maintainable, and scalable architectures.

• Build validation frameworks for verifying implemented algorithms.

• Create Software Detailed Design documentation.

• Perform Static Analysis, Unit Testing, and Integration Testing.

• Take complete ownership of assigned tasks from concept to deployment.

• Evaluate third-party software, debug field issues, and conduct peer reviews.

• Collaborate with the hardware team for board bring-up, understanding schematics and hardware interfaces.

• Work with RTOS-based and multi-threaded systems.

• Implement low-level drivers for microcontrollers and SoCs (ADC, PWM, GPIO, Timers, RTC, Flash, EEPROM, etc.).

• Debug and bring up embedded systems using tools such as UARTs, JTAG, oscilloscopes, multimeters, and logic analysers.

• Integrate with FPGAs and work on systems involving AMD Zynq UltraScale SoCs.

• Work with Yocto/PetaLinux build flows and Linux kernel compilation from scratch.

• Develop using build systems such as CMake, and ensure smooth build and integration workflows.

• Work on low-level driver design for high-speed HW/SW interfaces.

• Apply strong debugging, analytical, verification, and validation skills for embedded systems.




Requirements

Requirements

• B.Tech, BS, MS, or PhD in EE/CE/CS, or equivalent experience with evidence of exceptional ability.

• Strong understanding of embedded system constraints versus software platform design trade-offs.

• Proficiency in C and C++, compilers, and build & source control tools.

• Solid understanding of computer architecture, particularly HW/SW interfaces for high-speed communication.

• Experience with Linux kernel and UNIX APIs.

• Working knowledge of emulation systems, build automation, and virtual platforms.

• Familiarity with parallel or SIMD programming.

• Experience in debugging complex embedded systems and working in lab environments.


Good to Have

• Knowledge of Agile/Scrum methodology.

• Experience with UML design.

• Scripting experience in Python or Perl.

• Background in mechatronics, robotics, or avionics systems.

• Experience in low-level driver design for SoCs.


Personality Traits

• Excellent creative thinking and attention to detail.

• Strong ownership mindset with the ability to work independently and in distributed teams.

• Eagerness to learn and stay updated with the latest industry advancements.

• Ability to work under deadlines in dynamic environments.



Benefits

• Fair compensation will be provided as per market standards

• Experience rapid growth and start-up culture

• Flexible Working Hours

• Open to exploring, discussing and implementing new ideas and processes

• Opportunity to work closely with the Founding Team at GalaxEye

• Get a chance to work with Advisors holding senior positions and decades of experience.


------------------

33.
About the job
About Ethernovia, Inc.

Ethernovia is fundamentally changing how cars of the future are built by unifying in-vehicle networks into an end-to-end Ethernet system. Founded in 2018, we're inventing the future of automobile's communication! We are transforming automobiles' communication network to enable the autonomous driving, electrical vehicle (EV) and software defined revolutions. Our breakthrough compute, communication, and software virtualization ushers in a new era of car connectivity and capabilities. We bring together, accelerate, and unify the car's cameras/sensors, compute, and outside world to enable new advanced driver assistance features and services.

Ethernovia's co-founders are serial technology entrepreneurs with multiple prior successful ventures together. We are well-funded and backed by some of the worlds' leading technology investors, having secured $64m in Series A funding. (Ethernovia Raises $64 Million to Accelerate the Revolution of Vehicle Networks | Business Wire). Our financial backers include Porsche SE, Qualcomm, AMD, and Western Digital

Ethernovia has been recognized in EE Times' prestigious list of the Top 100 Startups for 2025.

January 2024: Our CEO Ramin Shirani Named MotorTrend Software-Defined Vehicle Innovator Awards Winner (ethernovia.com)

September 2023: Continental and Ethernovia Announce Partnership to Develop Automotive Switch in 7nm
 - Ethernovia

Connected Car News: Helios, Continental, Ethernovia, Avanci, BMW, Mapbox, Porsche, SEMA, Honda, UltraSense, Flex Logix, Diodes Inc., Garmin, Toyota & Caruso | auto connected car news

With talented employees on 4 continents, we have filed > 50 patents to date.

Join Ethernovia's team to make a lasting impact on the future of mobility. Come share in our success with pre-IPO shares, competitive compensation, and great benefits while growing your knowledge and career with world class talent. We are looking for talented engineers and leaders who have an entrepreneurial spirit and want to drive their design from concept to silicon to their next car.

The Software team at Ethernovia builds cutting-edge software systems closely knit with our hardware communication and acceleration solutions. We build the full stack, starting from Software Modeling, Applications, SDK, Middleware, OS Kernel Drivers, Firmware, Compilers, Micro-code, Frameworks, Tools, Infrastructure and Evaluation/Test Platforms. All of this for automotive grade, safety critical systems with the highest grade of qualifications including MISRA, AUTOSAR and ASPICE.


-------------------

34.
About the job
About Lumilens

At Lumilens we are building the critical photonics infrastructure that powers tomorrow’s AI supercomputing. From chip-to-chip optical interconnects to scalable photonic engines, Lumilens is unlocking a new era of computing - faster, cooler, and massively more efficient.

We’re a well-funded startup backed by Mayfield and led by veterans who’ve built and scaled some of the most transformative technologies in the industry. At Lumilens, we’re developing high-speed photonics products purpose-built to power the future of AI infrastructure and high-performance computing.

This isn’t incremental innovation, it’s a ground-floor opportunity to rethink the optical layer from the silicon up. You’ll work alongside a team of world-class engineers solving some of the hardest challenges in scaling optical systems. Every line of code, every design decision, every breakthrough you help deliver will shape the infrastructure of tomorrow.

If you're looking for mission, momentum, and the chance to make an outsized impact, jump on the rocket ship. We’re just getting started.

Position Overview

We are seeking an experienced technical leader to join our growing team and lead development of the embedded software for our high-speed fiber optical transceiver products. This position will work closely with other transceiver engineering disciplines for requirements analysis, design, implementation, and test of embedded software for our fiber optic transceiver products. You will work with our technical teams and help us to deliver our family of optical transceiver solutions to the market.

Key Responsibilities

Lead software design, development and code reviews
Develop high-quality C code in a real-time embedded environment
Work with the cross functional teams to design, implement, & test embedded SW solutions
Specify, design, implement, and test functionality and behaviors of embedded subsystems, including:
Communication protocols using I2C/I3C interfaces
Configuration of Microcontrollers, DSPs and Photonics components. 
State machines for system control, optical calibrations and data flow management. 
CMIS (Common Management Interface Specification) standards compliance
Design software test strategies and collaborate with verification test teams
Provide technical leadership for software developers and mentor engineers on the team
Communicate and document software architectures, designs, and test plans. 
Participate in hands-on hardware bring-up, troubleshooting and failure analysis

Required Qualifications

Bachelor’s degree in Electrical Engineering, Computer Engineering, or related field
10+ years of experience in embedded software development
Strong proficiency in C, C++, and Python programming languages
Strong software engineering fundamentals, such as abstraction, layering, modularization, and interface design, with a focus on delivering high-quality, reliable software
Knowledge of photonics, optical communication systems and network infrastructure
Experience with real-time operating systems (e.g., FreeRTOS)
Experience using common test equipment, such as oscilloscopes, signal analyzers, protocol analyzers. 
Ability to read and understand schematic diagrams

What we offer

Competitive salary commensurate with experience Comprehensive benefits package including health insurance
Professional development opportunities and certification support
Access to cutting-edge technology and cloud platforms
Collaborative work environment with cross-functional teams
Lumilens is an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration without regard to race, color, religion, gender, identity, orientation, veteran status, disability, or any other legally protected status.

---------------------

35.
About the job
The Company

Dexcom Corporation (NASDAQ DXCM) is a pioneer and global leader in continuous glucose monitoring (CGM). Dexcom began as a small company with a big dream: To forever change how diabetes is managed. To unlock information and insights that drive better health outcomes. Here we are 25 years later, having pioneered an industry. And we're just getting started. We are broadening our vision beyond diabetes to empower people to take control of health. That means personalized, actionable insights aimed at solving important health challenges. To continue what we've started: Improving human health.

We are driven by thousands of ambitious, passionate people worldwide who are willing to fight like warriors to earn the trust of our customers by listening, serving with integrity, thinking big, and being dependable. We've already changed millions of lives and we're ready to change millions more. Our future ambition is to become a leading consumer health technology company while continuing to develop solutions for serious health conditions. We'll get there by constantly reinventing unique biosensing-technology experiences. Though we've come a long way from our small company days, our dreams are bigger than ever. The opportunity to improve health on a global scale stands before us.

To all Staffing and Recruiting Agencies: Our Careers Site is only for individuals seeking a job at Dexcom. Only authorized staffing and recruiting agencies may use this site or to submit profiles, applications or resumes on specific requisitions. Dexcom does not accept unsolicited resumes or applications from agencies. Please do not forward resumes to the Talent Acquisition team, Dexcom employees or any other company location. Dexcom is not responsible for any fees related to unsolicited resumes/applications.
____________
36.
About the job
Job Requirements 

Embedded Firmware Engineer

Job Description:

BE / B.Tech / M.tech:

4 to 7 years of experience in Embedded firmware & application development and communication protocols

Mandatory Skills:

Domain skills:

Industrial Control & Automation
Industrial communication protocols
Prior hands-on experience in EtherNet IP / IEC61850 / Profibus / Modbus TCP protocol standards and implementation experience

Technology And Tool Skills:

Hands on experience in design / architecture for embedded control systems - firmware and applications using object-oriented concepts
Hands on experience - Strong in C, C++, UML
Hands on experience in RTOS – VxWorks
Hands on experience in development and testing of communication protocols stacks
Ability to understand all layers right from BSP, device drivers, middleware and application layers
Testing, test tools like Lauterbach, ICE, Trace32, Test complete, Enterprise Architect etc.
Static code analysis, tools like PCLint, Klocwork etc.
Hands on experience on using configuration management tools - TFS. Knowledge on activities like branching, baselines, code and design reviews process.

Others:

Embedded systems projects involving hands on design and implementation.
Prior experience on safety critical software development is highly preferred.
Must have been involved in full product life cycle for any of the products involving real time embedded software systems.
Good communication skills – written and oral
Very good team player, should be able to work with teams from different regions spread across the world.

Work Experience 

Embedded Firmware Engineer

Others:

Embedded systems projects involving hands on design and implementation.
Prior experience on safety critical software development is highly preferred.
Must have been involved in full product life cycle for any of the products involving real time embedded software systems.
Good communication skills – written and oral
Very good team player, should be able to work with teams from different regions spread across the world.



----------

37.
About the job
Job Requirements

At Quest Global, it’s not just what we do but how and why we do it that makes us different. With over 25 years as an engineering services provider, we believe in the power of doing things differently to make the impossible possible. Our people are driven by the desire to make the world a better place—to make a positive difference that contributes to a brighter future. We bring together technologies and industries, alongside the contributions of diverse individuals who are empowered by an intentional workplace culture, to solve problems better and faster.

Key Responsibilities

Job Description:10+ Years of experience

Location: Noida

Role

 Extensive experience in Automotive Systems, with deep understanding of technologies, trends and needs
 Extensive experience in defining, developing, and implementing security software, ideally with a strong embedded firmware development background
 Ability to troubleshoot complex issues and debug firmware
 Experience with Agile methodologies and software development lifecycles
 Experience in Functional Safety (ISO 26262).
 Familiar with cybersecurity ISO 21434 ,
 Strong understanding of security standards, security protocols, cryptography.
 Strong understanding of Security Threat modelling and risk analysis and application of countermeasures.
 Strong technical skills with a team first mentality. Strong ability to work cross functionally, across many stakeholders to drive towards common goals and objectives
 Ability to engage with key technical stakeholders at customer to build trust and confidence
 Experience in working with global teams in matrix organizations.

Required Qualifications

 Bachelor’s or Master’s degree in Electronics Engineering, Computer Engineering, or related field with 10 years or more relevant experience.
 Experience with technical analysis and decomposition of customer use-case.
 Proven experience in Microcontroller Architecture, Software, SoC Architecture, or system-level Integration.
 Strong expertise in C programming, Enterprise Architect (UML).
 Strong understanding of security standards, security protocols, cryptography.
 Strong understanding of microprocessor and microcontroller architectures, including CPU cores, DSP, memory management, and peripheral integration.
 Strong collaboration skills to work directly with customers and across multidisciplinary teams, including silicon, software, firmware, board design engineers and program management.
 Experience in Automotive software development processes.

Furthermore, You Are

 Innovator finding break-through solutions for complex automotive problems
 Driving for continuous improvements.

We are known for our extraordinary people who make the impossible possible every day. Questians are driven by hunger, humility, and aspiration. We believe that our company culture is the key to our ability to make a true difference in every industry we reach. Our teams regularly invest time and dedicated effort into internal culture work, ensuring that all voices are heard.

We wholeheartedly believe in the diversity of thought that comes with fostering a culture rooted in respect, where everyone belongs, is valued, and feels inspired to share their ideas. We know embracing our unique differences makes us better, and that solving the worlds hardest engineering problems requires diverse ideas, perspectives, and backgrounds. We shine the brightest when we tap into the many dimensions that thrive across over 21,000 difference-makers in our workplace.


---------

38.
About the job
Job Description

Firmware Engineer 5

Duties of Position: (Include specific duties and responsibilities)

The Person Should Perform The Following In His Role

 Architect Open BMC Solutions: Lead the design and implementation of Open-BMC distributions tailored for hyper scale hardware, including hardware abstraction layers

and D-Bus interfaces. Responsible for defining the overall system architecture, choosing the security framework (Root of Trust, SPDM), and ensuring the BMC

integrates seamlessly with BIOS and cloud-scale fleet management

 Hyper scale Collaboration: Partner with Hardware and Systems teams to define firmware requirements for OCP (Open Compute Project) compliant servers and storage

enclosures.

 Modern CI/CD Integration: Drive automated testing and continuous integration workflows for firmware, ensuring high-velocity deployments without sacrificing stability.
 Security & Root of Trust: Implement and maintain platform security features, including Secure Boot and hardware Root of Trust (RoT) integration.
 Full-Stack Ownership: Manage firmware development from low-level boot loaders (U-Boot) to high-level management APIs (Redfish/gRPC).
 Production Support: Provide expert-level debugging for critical issues identified in hyper scale data centre, utilizing remote telemetry and crash dump analysis.
 Participate in firmware code development and code review process
 Provide weekly status updates to key stake-holders on development status

Qualifications Required: (Education, experience, skills, etc. Please be specific)

BS/MS/BE/BTech or ME/MTech in EE, CS, or CE with 12 to 15 years of relevant firmware experience.

 Open-BMC Framework: Expert-level knowledge of D-Bus, Systemd, and Bitbake/Yocto Project within the OpenBMC ecosystem.
 Modern Management APIs: Deep experience with Redfish, MCTP, PLDM, and PDRs.
 Linux Systems: Linux kernel development, device tree configuration, and driver development for X86 and ARM platforms. Hardware Protocols: Advanced

troubleshooting of I2C/I3C, SPI, eSPI, PCIe/VDM, and PMBus.

 Languages: Expert C/C++ (specifically modern C++ used in OpenBMC) and Python/Go for automation.
 Cloud-Scale Tooling: Experience with Git, Gerrit, Jenkins, and containerization (Docker) for firmware build environments.
 Hardware Bring-up: Experience with Aspeed AST2500/AST2600 (the industry-standard BMC chips) and low-level debugging using JTAG, oscilloscopes, and logic

analyzers. BMC rebranding. Linux Socket programming and IPC, Shell scripting Knowledge in GPUs, Linux drivers development

 Knowledge and development experience in Web scripting, test Automation scripts Software security, Knowledge in SATS
 Process development & Documentation System debugging, Firmware testing (Unit, Acceptance) and Validation
 Hyper scale Experience: Proven track record of shipping firmware for Hyper-scalar data centre products (AWS, Azure, Meta, or Tier 1 OEMs).
 Strong history of working with Open-BMC; experience replacing proprietary stacks (AMI, Avocent) with open-source alternatives is highly preferred.
 Comprehensive understanding of modern server topology, including CPUs (Intel/AMD), GPUs, and NVMe storage. Experience implementing Cerberus, Titan, or similar

hardware security protocols. Ability to represent the company in industry forums (OCP) and collaborate with geographically distributed open-source contributors.

--------------------

39.

About the job
Requirements

Must be fluent in English.
Strong C/C++ skills are a must.
Basic BIOS knowledge is a plus.
Knowledge of the x86 architecture is required.
Working with Windows drivers for x86 is a plus.
Good problem-solving and software debugging skills.
2-3 years of experience with embedded software development is required.
Documentation experience in a training development environment is a plus.
Strong interpersonal, telephone, written, and group communication skills are required.
Good experience with clocks, resets, level translators, glue logic, etc.
Experience in High Speed I/Os like PCIe (preferably Gen4 and above), Memory (DDR4/DDR5 LPDDR4/LPDDR5), USB4.0/3.2/3.1
Basic knowledge of scripting languages like Python, Shell, etc. is required; x86 assembly language programming knowledge is a plus.
Understanding of the embedded software development flow, including Baremetal, Linux, application development, knowledge of BSPs, software libraries, device drivers, and RTOS is required.
HW/Schematic experience with CPUs is a plus, as well as CRB (Customer Reference Board) bring-up work/activities, Test and Validation, Reporting and Customer support.

This job was posted by Ks Omprakash from Fubeus.

----------

40.
About the job
This role has been designed as ‘Hybrid’ with an expectation that you will work on average 2 days per week from an HPE office.

Who We Are

Hewlett Packard Enterprise is the global edge-to-cloud company advancing the way people live and work. We help companies connect, protect, analyze, and act on their data and applications wherever they live, from edge to cloud, so they can turn insights into outcomes at the speed required to thrive in today’s complex world. Our culture thrives on finding new and better ways to accelerate what’s next. We know varied backgrounds are valued and succeed here. We have the flexibility to manage our work and personal needs. We make bold moves, together, and are a force for good. If you are looking to stretch and grow your career our culture will embrace you. Open up opportunities with HPE.

Job Description

High Performance Computing, AI and Labs is a critical element of HPE. We are focused on delivering innovative solutions that accelerate our customers’ digital transformation, enabling them to tackle their complex, and data-intensive workloads. Combining deep expertise and the development of the world’s most cutting-edge, high-performance supercomputers, is defining the next era of computing delivering valuable insight & innovation. Join us and redefine what’s next for you.

What You’ll Do

Management Level Definition:

Contributions impact technical components of HPE products, solutions, or services regularly and sustainable. Applies advanced subject matter knowledge to solve complex business issues and is regarded as a subject matter expert. Provides expertise and partnership to functional and technical project teams and may participate in cross-functional initiatives. Exercises significant independent judgment to determine best method for achieving objectives. May provide team leadership and mentoring to others.

Responsibilities

Designs enhancements, updates, and programming changes for portions and subsystems of firmware, including DSP, embedded code, CHIF, I2C, SPI drivers, BMC applications and BIOS/UEFI.
Leads multiple project teams of other software systems engineers and internal and outsourced development partners responsible for all stages of design and development for complex products and platforms, including solution design, analysis, coding, testing, and integration.
Manages and expands relationships with internal and outsourced development partners on software systems design and development.
Reviews and evaluates designs and project activities for compliance with systems design and development guidelines and standards; provides tangible feedback to improve product quality and mitigate failure risk.
Provides domain-specific expertise and overall software systems leadership and perspective to cross-organization projects, programs, and activities.
Drives innovation and integration of new technologies into projects and activities in the software systems design organization.
Provides guidance and mentoring to less- experienced staff members.

What You Need To Bring

Education and Experience Required: 

Bachelor's or master's degree in Electronics & Communication, Computer Science, Information Systems, or equivalent.
Typically, 10+ years' experience.

Knowledge And Skills

Strong programming experience in C and C++
Strong understanding of the Server manageability domain in specific and Server Industry in General.
Design, Debug and Development on RTOS like Green hills Integrity, Embedded Linux.
Experience working with ARM processor or similar system controllers.
Expertise in multiple firmware design tools and languages.
Experience in overall architecture of software systems for products and solutions.
Designing and integrating software systems running on multiple platform types into the overall architecture.
Evaluating and selecting forms and processes for software systems testing and methodology, including writing and execution of test plans, debugging, and testing scripts and tools.
History of innovation with multiple patents or deployed solutions in the field of software design.
Experience in openBMC or Yocto-based Baseboard Management Controllers (BMC).
Strong programming experience in C and C++ or Python
Experience in Linux - device driver development, Inter-process communication, interrupt and exception handling, and dynamic memory handling.
Working knowledge of debugging tools like gdb, kdb, and JTAG debuggers.
Experience working with multi-core ARM processors or similar system controllers.

Additional Skills

Cloud Architectures, Cross Domain Knowledge, Design Thinking, Development Fundamentals, DevOps, Distributed Computing, Microservices Fluency, Full Stack Development, Security-First Mindset, Solutions Design, Testing & Automation, User Experience (UX)

What We Can Offer You

Health & Wellbeing

We strive to provide our team members and their loved ones with a comprehensive suite of benefits that supports their physical, financial and emotional wellbeing.

Personal & Professional Development

We also invest in your career because the better you are, the better we all are. We have specific programs catered to helping you reach any career goals you have — whether you want to become a knowledge expert in your field or apply your skills to another division.

Unconditional Inclusion

We are unconditionally inclusive in the way we work and celebrate individual uniqueness. We know varied backgrounds are valued and succeed here. We have the flexibility to manage our work and personal needs. We make bold moves, together, and are a force for good.


-----------
41.
About the job
Role: Senior Flight Software Engineer - Firmware

Employment Type: Full Time

Role Description:

This role will contribute towards the development of flight software that will be deployed on our satellites and you will get to work as a part of our Software Systems group. If you love working at the cutting edge of technology and want to contribute towards making the world a better place by bringing down the benefits of space down to earth, this is the place for you.

Responsibilities & Duties:

Translate mission requirements and various satellite subsystem requirements into reliable flight software for Pixxel’s satellites. 
Support processing hardware selection, simulation software development and debugging activity. 
Be involved in hardware-software integration of the satellite and multiple levels of Software-In-Loop-Simulation Tests. 
Responsible for qualifying and integrating algorithms at various stages with hardware, including simulations, module/system level integration. 
Define the end implementation of the algorithm along with Pixxel's Software Systems Group. 

Skills and Requirements:

Proficiency in writing memory optimized software for embedded systems (bare-metal/RTOS/Linux) with a knack for writing elegant code. 
Strong documentation and interpersonal communication skills. 
Strong analytical and problem solving skills. 
Proficient in Embedded C/C++ and Python. 
Experience in working with the ARM architecture. 
Experience in debugging using oscilloscope, logic analyzer, JTAG, etc. 
Experience in using version control software (preferably Git). 
Knowledge in any of the following is a plus — Model-based development, code certifications, CI/CD, static analyzers, test automation, flight simulators. 

Preferred Qualifications:

Bachelor’s Degree or higher in Computer Science or Electrical Engineering. 
7+ years of experience working with low level code in embedded software environments. 
Thorough knowledge of embedded software development and experience developing fault-tolerant software. 
Significant understanding of embedded software principles and ability to contribute in design sessions. 

Candidate Acumen:

Self-starter who thrives in a fast-paced, high-growth startup environment with evolving priorities.

Benefits:

Health insurance coverage
Unlimited leaves & flexible working hours
Role-based remote work and work-from-home benefit
Relocation assistance
Professional Mental Wellness services
Creche facility for primary caregivers (limited to India)
Employee Stock Options for all hires

About Pixxel

Pixxel is a space data company and spacecraft manufacturer redefining Earth observation with hyperspectral imaging. The company’s first constellation of six commercial hyperspectral satellites—Fireflies—deliver imagery at 5-meter resolution and 135+ spectral bands, providing 50x richer detail than traditional Earth observation systems and unlocking insights across agriculture, climate, energy, environment, and more.

Once fully deployed, Pixxel’s constellation of 18–24 satellites will capture imagery across up to 250 bands in VNIR and SWIR ranges, with a 40 km swath and daily global revisit capability. Pixxel’s most unique strength is its full-stack approach, integrating every layer of the value chain from satellite hardware and manufacturing to AI-powered analytics.

Pixxel’s satellite constellation is complemented by Aurora, its in-house Earth Observation Studio that simplifies satellite imagery analysis and democratises remote sensing for all. Designed to make hyperspectral data more accessible, Aurora by Pixxel combines high-frequency imagery with AI-powered tools to generate actionable insights, even for users without technical backgrounds. The third pillar of Pixxel’s ecosystem is its in-house satellite manufacturing capability. Beyond building its own spacecraft, Pixxel also provides satellite systems and subsystems to other organisations. This dual capacity sets it apart in a sector where most companies focus on either payload design or data operations, but not both.

Pixxel’s team is young but deeply mission-aligned, with a culture rooted in curiosity, speed, and long-term thinking. As the company grows its constellation and expands Aurora, the focus remains on making space-based insights practical, scalable, and genuinely helpful so that the health of the planet becomes measurable and action becomes possible.

Pixxel was the only Indian startup selected for the Techstars Starburst Space Accelerator in Los Angeles and has been recognised in TIME’s Best Inventions of 2023, Fast Company’s Most Innovative Companies, and Via Satellite’s Top Innovators list.

For more information, see our Careers page or follow Pixxel on LinkedIn and X/Twitter.

Culture

Pixxel is an organisation where we enable our employees to work on world-changing problems that they are passionate about, and a place where they can be their best selves day in and day out while ensuring they have fun every day.

Central to our employee-first ethos is a commitment to ensuring that every team member feels valued and heard. We nurture a healthy and supportive work environment where we prioritise well-being and growth in all aspects of life.

---------------

42.
About the job
Job Requirements

At Quest Global, it’s not just what we do but how and why we do it that makes us different. With over 25 years as an engineering services provider, we believe in the power of doing things differently to make the impossible possible. Our people are driven by the desire to make the world a better place—to make a positive difference that contributes to a brighter future. We bring together technologies and industries, alongside the contributions of diverse individuals who are empowered by an intentional workplace culture, to solve problems better and faster.

Key Responsibilities

Analyze requirements
Development and debugging
Unit Testing
Maintaining defect fixes
Timely completion and on time delivery of tasks
Prompt Status update
Communication with stakeholders
Work independently
Collaborating with team members and managing team

We are known for our extraordinary people who make the impossible possible every day. Questians are driven by hunger, humility, and aspiration. We believe that our company culture is the key to our ability to make a true difference in every industry we reach. Our teams regularly invest time and dedicated effort into internal culture work, ensuring that all voices are heard.

We wholeheartedly believe in the diversity of thought that comes with fostering a culture rooted in respect, where everyone belongs, is valued, and feels inspired to share their ideas. We know embracing our unique differences makes us better, and that solving the worlds hardest engineering problems requires diverse ideas, perspectives, and backgrounds. We shine the brightest when we tap into the many dimensions that thrive across over 21,000 difference-makers in our workplace.

Work Experience

Bachelor’s degree in computer science, Engineering, or a related field
4 to 7 years of strong embedded C++ software development experience including designing, programming, Debugging, and testing in embedded products
Experience in Microcontrollers (STM / i.MX)
Design and implementation knowledge on device drivers for I2C, SPI, UART, ADC, USB, CAN peripherals & protocols
Ability to use Hardware test equipment’s: oscilloscope, logic analyser, JTAG, memory analyser, USB analyser and protocol analysers 
Ability to read and understand schematics
Hands on experience on unit testing frameworks 
Work in an agile environment.
Proficient understanding of code versioning tools such as Git.
Ability to work independently or with a group and self-motivated.
Collaborate with hardware and system teams for board bring-up and debugging.
Good to have medical domain knowledge & real time systems.


------------

43.
About the job
Role: Firmware Development



Experience: 6 years to 13 years



Location: Hyderabad



Technical Skills

Embedded Systems: Strong understanding of embedded systems architecture, including Microprocessors & Microcontrollers (8/16/32 bit) circuits design, Memory interfaces (SDRAM, DDR, Flash, EPROM etc)
C/C++ Programming: Proficiency in C/C++ programming, including object-oriented programming (OOP) concepts.
Embedded Linux: Handson experience in working in Linux Environment. Strong understanding of Embedded Linux systems, including kernel configuration, device drivers, and system services.
Embedded Debugging: Experience with debugging tools and techniques for embedded systems, including JTAG, GDB, printk, kernel logging, Perf, Valgrind, and core dump analysis.
Real-Time Operating Systems (RTOS): Experience with RTOS like Embedded Linux (Yocto, Build root), VxWorks, Zephyr, FreeRTOS.
Interrupts and Timers: Knowledge of interrupt handling and timer mechanisms in embedded systems.
Protocols: Proven experience working with TCP/IP, UDP, HTTP, FTP, SNTP, PTP, Redfish,CAN,I2C
Cybersecurity: Understanding of security principles and practices in embedded systems, including secure coding practices, vulnerability assessment, and intrusion detection.
Docker/Containers: Familiarity with containerization technologies like Docker and container orchestration tools like Kubernetes.
Hands-on Experience: Proven track record of hands-on experience in embedded system development, especially in Linux environments, including hardware bring-up, software development, and system integration.
 



Educational Qualifications:

Education: Engineering Degree in Electronics & Communication /Electrical and Electronics/Electronics & Instrumentation


------------

44.
About the job
Job Description Summary

Many employers promise the chance to make a difference – at GE Vernova, you can change the world. Bringing clean, affordable power to the developing world, decarbonizing the world’s electricity network, helping to build the grid of the future powered by renewable energy … they’re all part of our company’s strategy. If you're passionate about developing firmware, and excited to tackle UN SDG-7,13 and Energy Transition challenges, as well as motivated by the prospect of shaping the future of energy industry through innovation and new business models, we encourage you to apply. Join us in our journey to redefine what's possible with AI and make a lasting impact on the world of Energy.

We are seeking a dynamic, forward-thinking and results-driven Lead Engineer – Embedded SW Development, who will be responsible for designing, developing, and testing Embedded Software (Firmware), platforms and systems that need to be tailored to the needs of the hardware that it controls and runs on. Typically requires a deep understanding of the characteristics of the physical device being controlled, the functions, it is expected to perform and the ability to design, develop, implement, and test the logic and software required to realize the real-time functionality. Executes standard operational/technical tasks typically subject to instructions and work routines.

Reporting to Senior Engineering manager, the Lead Engineer – Embedded SW Development will work in close collaboration with GA product lines, R&D teams, product management and other GA functions.

As part of a multi-developer firmware team the major responsibilities will include analysis, design, implementation and testing of firmware for different product line.

Job Description

Essential Responsibilities:

The Lead Engineer - Embedded SW Development will be responsible for:

Design, develop, implement, and debug embedded software and/or firmware features/set of features for a small module or a large component of entire embedded software product.

Integrate software packages with existing systems and sub-systems.

Prepare unit test and regression test specification, packages, and templates.

Interact with a multi-discipline engineering team to meet the project requirements throughout its life cycle.

Prepare formal and informal engineering documentation (e.g., Design documents, code reviews, Release reports etc.).

Engages in technical discussions; participates in technical designs and presents technical ideas through white boarding.

Works closely with peers and keeps engaging in a fast pace technical design and development team.

Executes in a fast-paced delivery mode and focuses in delivering tasks to meet the product release goal.

Maintains code quality through best practices, code reviews and unit testing.

Qualifications/Requirements

Bachelor’s degree in computer science, Electrical Engineering, or Electronics Engineering.

A minimum of 5 years of embedded development experience in industrial setting.

Proficient in Real-Time Embedded Software Engineering in C/C++ on any embedded processor/DSP/Microcontroller and RTOS (e.g., FreeRTOS, TI-RTOS, Embedded Linux, RT-Linux, VxWorks etc.), File system, Boot, Device drivers.

Experience in stack integration and application firmware development.

Well familiar with HW/SW interfacing, and real-time design consideration.

Experience in working with fast network/data interfaces like 1G/10G Ethernet, PCI-E

Familiarity with cybersecurity constructs (Static Analysis, Digital Signatures etc.)

Familiar with Agile-SW development practices.

Able to share ideas and work well in a team environment, proactive approach to tasks displaying initiative.

Guide and mentor others in the team.

Flexible and adaptable; open to change and modification of tasks, working in multi-tasking environment.

Desired Characteristics

Experience developing multi-threaded/ multi-tasking real time applications.

Using emulators, simulators, and software analysis tools and Proficient in debugging code.

Sound knowledge of Processors, DSPs (preferably from Analog Devices or TI) and Microcontrollers (preferably ARM cores on Intel or Freescale chips).

Experience on development of Industrial and /or Utility Communication protocols like IEC 61850, DNP, IEC 60870-5-104, etc.

Cyber security aspects, such as symmetric and asymmetric cryptography and PKI Infrastructure, LDAP, RADIUS, TLS, SSH, SFTP, RSA, HTTPS, is an asset.

Experience in using MATLAB/Simulink for Target Layer independence.

Experience in all phases of the product engineering and development cycle.

Additional Information

Relocation Assistance Provided: No


------------------

45.
About the job
Job Description 

 Job Title: Firmware Development and testing

Embedded development engineer with minimum 2 to 5 years of hands on experience in working on C code FW, Middleware, driver development, Debug and testing.
Job Summary

Should work out of the customer location on a daily basis.
Previous experience on embedded development, Linux kernel porting and OS driver / firmware bare metal driver.
Python development hands on
PICe driver, CXL protocol knowledge will be an added advantage.
 

Key Responsibilities

Should be proactive in taking up /attend the customer task
Come up with an implementation approach and schedule before actual implementation.
Daily status update on the task carried and progress
Attend customer internal calls and comply to action items.
Education and Experience

Bachelor's degree in EL & TC or equivalent 
2 to 5 years on Embedded code development, debug and testing
Skills and Competencies

Proficiency in C (must)
Embedded SW design and development.
Integration of SW & HW and testing
Tools: gdb, compilers, debuggers, JTAG, ICE, etc.
Python development (medium level)


-----------
46.
About the job
Job Description: Embedded Firmware Engineer – AC-DC / DC-DC Power Converters (P21)

Role Summary

The Firmware or Embedded Software is responsible for developing, implementing, and validating embedded control software for AC-DC rectifiers, DC-DC converters, on-board/off-board chargers, SMPS, and power conversion systems.

The role focuses on control algorithms, digital control loop development, real-time firmware, protection logic, communication protocols, and hardware bring-up. End to end responsibility of firmware development and functionality.

Key Responsibilities

 Embedded Firmware Development

Develop low-level firmware for digital controllers

TI C2000 (F2803x, F2837x, F28004x, F28x series), ARM Cortex-M microcontrollers, DSP/FPGA

Implement control loops for AC-DC and DC-DC conversion such as Current loop, voltage loop, PFC control (totem Poly, CCM, interleaved), LLC/DC-DC stage control, Soft-start, mode transition, burst modes

Develop firmware for PWM generation, ADC sampling, interrupts, timers.

 Converter Control Algorithms
Design, tune, and validate algorithms for AC-DC PFC control (average, peak, digital), DC-DC resonant/LLC control,– Phase-shifted full bridge, Buck/Boost control, multi-phase interleaving
Implement digital compensators (PI, PID, feed-forward, PR, PLL).
 Protection & Safety Logic
Develop firmware for protections OVP/UVP, OCP, SCP, Over-temperature, Soft-switching protection, Input/output surge and transient protections
Implement fast fault detection and safe shutdown algorithms.
 Hardware Bring-up & Validation
Work with hardware engineers to validate Gate drivers, Power stage behaviour, ADC sensing circuits, Board bring-up and debugging
Perform real-time testing using oscilloscope, power analyser, logic analyser.
 Digital Communication & Interfaces
Should implement the following protocol CAN / CAN open /1939/Modbus/RS485/Ethernet/UART/SPI/ I2C
Should Integrate firmware with cloud/BMS/controllers if required.
 System Integration & Optimization

Ensure firmware meets requirements for Efficiency, Dynamic response, EMI/EMC, compliance, Start-up/shutdown sequencing, Optimize real-time control code for performance and safety.

 Documentation

Prepare firmware architecture, Requirements & design specifications, Test cases & validation reports, Version control

Technical Skills

Strong understanding of power electronics control
Experience in AC-DC and DC-DC converter control firmware.
Hands-on with real-time embedded programming (C, C++).
Experience with digital control libraries (TI DCL, CMSIS DSP).
Understanding of PWM modules, ADC sampling, control timing.
Good debugging skills on real hardware.

Tools

Code Composer Studio (TI), Keil, IAR, STM32Cube.
MATLAB/Simulink (algorithm simulation).
Git, JIRA, SVN.

Qualifications

B.E / B.Tech / M.Tech in Electronics, Electrical, Embedded Systems, Power Electronics.

Experience 4-12 Years

Preferred Experience

Worked on 30+ kW-level converters for EV chargers, ESS, solar inverters, onboard chargers.

Knowledge of automotive ISO 26262, IEC 61800, IEC 61000 standards (preferred).

Exposure to SiC/GaN based systems. Experience with FPGA or RTOS is a plus.


-----------
47.

About the job
Role: Senior Firmware Engineer



Job Details :



Job Title: Senior Firmware Engineer

Type: Full-time

Location: On-Site (Bengaluru, India)

Number of Openings: 1



About us: 



At upliance.ai, we believe in Real Food. Zero Fuss. We’re building India’s first Smart Cooking Companions - Upliance 1.0 and 2.0 that make everyday cooking simpler, faster, and healthier with the power of hardware and software combined.



Powered by our patented upAI technology, Upliance.ai products don’t just cook; they guide, learn, and evolve with you. And we’re only getting started. With new smart products in the pipeline, we’re pushing the boundaries of what home appliances can do for young India.

If you’re excited about creating technology that blends design, intelligence, and everyday impact you’ll feel right at home here.



Responsibility: 



Architect, design, and develop production-ready firmware for smart appliances with a focus on Bluetooth/BLE connectivity.
Lead firmware development across the product lifecycle — from prototyping and validation to manufacturing and post-launch support.
Optimize systems for performance, reliability, memory footprint, and power efficiency.
Collaborate cross-functionally with Hardware, Android, ML, and Front-end teams to deliver cohesive and scalable product features.
Drive debugging, root-cause analysis, and system validation to ensure high product reliability.
Establish best practices around modular firmware design, code reviews, testing, and documentation.
Contribute to continuous product iteration by incorporating user and field feedback.


Qualifications: 



BE/ME/MTech in Computer Science, Electrical, Electronics, or related fields.
5+ years of hands-on experience in embedded/firmware development.
Strong proficiency in C programming with solid experience in RTOS-based systems.
Proven experience in Bluetooth/BLE stack implementation and debugging, with a strong understanding of protocols and ecosystem integration.
Experience taking products from development to production in consumer or IoT devices.
Strong debugging skills with a structured, systems-thinking approach.
Ability to work independently while contributing effectively in a multidisciplinary environment.


Why upliance.ai? 



At upliance.ai, we believe that home cooking should be more of everything - more convenient, more fun, more nutritious, and of course more smart! Our vision is to bring smart technology to every inch of every home, across the world.



Real Product Impact: Build embedded systems that ship to and are used by real customers
Ownership: Work on end-to-end product development, not just isolated features
Fast-Paced Startup Culture: Rapid iteration, learning, and experimentation
Growth Opportunities: Expand your skills across hardware, firmware, and system design
Collaborative Team: Work alongside experienced engineers across disciplines



--------------

48.

About the job
At ABB, we help industries outrun - leaner and cleaner. Here, progress is an expectation - for you, your team, and the world. As a global market leader, we’ll give you what you need to make it happen. It won’t always be easy, growing takes grit. But at ABB, you’ll never run alone. Run what runs the world.

This Position reports to:

R&D Department Lead




Your role and responsibilities :

In this role, you will have the opportunity to contribute to ABB’s success with technology, software, product, and system development. Each day, you will identify and implement innovative solutions to relevant problems. You will also showcase your expertise by providing ideas and by being able to work both independently and as a part of a Research & Development (R&D) team.

The work model for the role is:  Hybrid

This role is contributing to the Process Automation Business of Measurement and Analytics Division in Bangalore.

You will be mainly accountable for:

You will be an active contributor to product development in Business Line Instrumentation from early concept phase to design, validation and release to the manufacturing units. 
You will work in R&D multidisciplinary project teams for design and development of embedded software for Instrumentation devices, and you will be responsible for functionality, performance, cost and quality of the deliveries.
You will be coordinating with hardware engineer and PC software & certification engineers for system debugging, designing and testing & documentation.
You will be working with technical experts and product managers in analyzing and implementing functional requirements considering scalability, extensibility, complexity of the software to solve complex problems.
You will collaborate actively with technical experts from other areas across functions and contribute to relevant forums both internal and external.

Qualifications for the role :

Bachelor’s degree or above Computer Engineering, Electrical /Electronic Engineering from a reputed University.
4 to 6 years of relevant work experience in embedded device software development preferably in electronic measurement instruments.
Good knowledge and hands-on experience in C/C++ language, familiar with DSP or ARM platforms and familiar with hardware driver development skills.
Proficient in embedded OS (ucOS/RTOS/FreeRTOS/eCos/VxWorks/Linux) development and solid knowledge in IDE, IAR/CCS/Keil
Strong interest in physics and sensing technologies. Domain knowledge in one of the following areas: process automation (preferred), industrial applications, automotive, medical.
Hands-on experience in with development tools like GIT, Azure DevOps, IDE, JIRA is a plus.
Relevant experience in industrial product development processes and knowledge in safety critical industrial applications

More about us :

The Measurement & Analytics Division is among the world’s leading manufacturers and suppliers of smart instrumentation and analyzers, working at the heart of industrial digital transformation. The Measurement & Analytics Division’s portfolio consists of analyzers measuring compositions of gases and liquids; instrumentation measuring process variables such as temperature, pressure, flow, and level; force measurement solutions measuring parameters such as flatness, thickness, and tension; and advanced digital solutions for device management, device health check and predictive maintenance. The Measurement & Analytics Division serves key industries such as oil and gas, chemical, water and wastewater, power, hydrogen, batteries, as well as the marine industry. The Division enables the optimization of industrial processes by providing and analyzing data collected from sensing and smart measurement devices. Parameters such as emission levels and production inputs are measured by providing ‘before’ and ‘after’ values, enabling efficient operations and environmental sustainability through measurement.

We value people from different backgrounds. Could this be your story? Apply today or visit www.abb.com to read more about us and learn about the impact of our solutions across the globe.

Fraud Warning: Any genuine offer from ABB will always be preceded by a formal application and interview process.

We never ask for money from job applicants.

For current open positions you can visit our career website https://global.abb/group/en/careers and apply.

Please refer to detailed recruitment fraud caution notice using the link https://global.abb/group/en/careers/how-to-apply/fraud-warning.


----------

49.
About the job
Embedded Software Engineer – RTOS & Post-Silicon Validation (Automotive Real-Time MCU)

Location: Pune / Bangalore – India

Join the RISC-V Revolution!

About GlobalFoundries

GlobalFoundries is a leading full-service semiconductor foundry providing a unique combination of design, development, and fabrication services to some of the world’s most inspired technology companies. With a global manufacturing footprint spanning three continents, GlobalFoundries makes possible the technologies and systems that transform industries and give customers the power to shape their markets. For more information, visit www.gf.com

Introduction

We are looking for talented Embedded Software Engineers to join our Automotive MCU Platform Team, with a focus on RTOS-based Software Development and Application Verification & Validation (AVV). You will be part of a growing team building MIPS’ RISC-V-based real-time processors and their associated software stack – shaping the future of embedded control systems for automotive applications like EVs, ADAS, powertrain, and domain controllers.

This is a unique opportunity to contribute across the full silicon-to-software lifecycle, combining software engineering with post-silicon validation to ensure high-quality, safety-critical SoC solutions.

Here’s What You Can Expect From Us

At MIPS now GlobalFoundries you’ll be a member of a fast-growing team of technologists that are creating the industry’s highest performance RISC-V processors. Small teams that are part of a non-compartmentalized structure – you’ll be able to understand and have an impact on the bigger picture. A great deal of autonomy, with support from some of the industry’s most experienced CPU engineers. An unlimited growth path – with the right skills, you can decide where you want to expand and grow in your role at MIPS. The opportunity to learn a great deal about the blossoming RISC-V architecture in cutting edge applications with industry leading customers.

What You’ll Do

Develop embedded software components for RTOS-based SDKs, including:
Low-Level Drivers (LLDs), HALs, RTOS abstraction layers, and BSPs
Example/demo applications to showcase peripheral functionality and performance
Support post-silicon validation (AVV) by:
Creating validation test apps that reuse RTOS SDK components
Bringing up first silicon and validating critical peripherals (ADC, PWM, CAN, LIN, watchdogs, etc.)
Supporting automation of lab and CI-based test execution
Collaborate across teams – work closely with architecture, hardware, safety, and tools teams to align software with silicon capabilities and roadmap
Contribute to reference software and tooling to aid customers in bootstrapping their own designs
Analyse and debug complex issues using emulators, silicon, and debug tools like OpenOCD, J-Link, or Lauterbach
Provide feedback into next-gen MCU architecture, based on software validation findings
Contribute to the wider RISC-V software ecosystem, helping to ensure support for the architecture in various open-source projects
You Should Have

3–6 years of hands-on experience in embedded systems software development
Strong skills in C/C++ programming, with basic familiarity in assembly
Good understanding of RTOS concepts (task scheduling, ISRs, semaphores, etc.)
Experience debugging complex multicore systems, experience with debugging tools (OpenOCD, Segger J-Link, Lauterbach)
Experience porting or developing on FreeRTOS, Zephyr, AUTOSAR OS, or similar platforms
Familiarity with bare-metal development, memory-mapped IO, and driver development
Experience in bring-up and debugging on real silicon or FPGA platforms
Knowledge of automotive interfaces and protocols: CAN, LIN, SPI, I2C, UART
Practical exposure to test automation, scripting (Python/bash), and version control (git)

Bonus Points For

Exposure to ASIL-D software development, ISO 26262 process, or safety validation
Prior involvement in post-silicon AVV or hardware-in-the-loop (HIL) test setups
Familiarity with RISC-V architecture, instruction sets, and toolchains
Experience developing or validating motor control, powertrain, or safety-critical firmware
Knowledge of bootloaders, secure update, or system startup firmware

What You’ll Get

Opportunity to work on cutting-edge RISC-V platforms with real industry adoption
A fast-paced, engineering-driven environment with minimal red tape
Mentorship from veteran CPU and embedded software engineers
Direct involvement in building safety-critical systems from the ground up
Exposure to a full-stack SoC development lifecycle: from pre-silicon to production-ready
Flexible growth path – whether you want to specialize deeply or lead in the future

GlobalFoundries is an equal opportunity employer, cultivating a diverse and inclusive workforce. We believe having a multicultural workplace enhances productivity, efficiency and innovation whilst our employees feel truly respected, valued and heard.

As an affirmative employer, all qualified applicants are considered for employment regardless of age, ethnicity, marital status, citizenship, race, religion, political affiliation, gender, sexual orientation and medical and/or physical abilities.

All offers of employment with GlobalFoundries are conditioned upon the successful completion of background checks, medical screenings as applicable and subject to the respective local laws and regulations.

To ensure that we maintain a safe and healthy workplace for our GlobalFoundries employees, please note that offered candidates who have applied for jobs in India will have to be fully vaccinated prior to their targeted start date.


-----------------
50.
About the job
WHAT YOU DO AT AMD CHANGES EVERYTHING

At AMD, our mission is to build great products that accelerate next-generation computing experiences—from AI and data centers, to PCs, gaming and embedded systems. Grounded in a culture of innovation and collaboration, we believe real progress comes from bold ideas, human ingenuity and a shared passion to create something extraordinary. When you join AMD, you’ll discover the real differentiator is our culture. We push the limits of innovation to solve the world’s most important challenges—striving for execution excellence, while being direct, humble, collaborative, and inclusive of diverse perspectives. Join us as we shape the future of AI and beyond. Together, we advance your career. 

LEAD FIRMWARE ENGINEER

The Role

We are looking for an MTS (Member of Technical Staff) Engineer with an obsession for firmware. As part of the role, this engineer will work closely with other firmware engineers, developers and architects across various IPs in designing and implementing firmware that spans pre-silicon and post-silicon for all AMD SoCs.

The Person

You are passionate about firmware development with creative and effective problem-solving skills, a motivated, self-starter who can work both independently and collaboratively in fast paced environments. You have excellent technical communication, interpersonal and leadership skills.

Key Responsibilities

Lead development, post silicon firmware support mainly focusing on memory subsystems, initialization, training etc for AMD Instinct™ MI Series products
Demonstrating excellent debugging capabilities
Work across engineering/firmware teams and subject areas spanning silicon, firmware, hardware, and software 
Coordinate debug of issues and drive them to closure 
Pull together meetings, set up clear agendas and follow up on action items 
Deliver regular progress updates toward program goals 
Make tough decisions such as priority calls based on partial or incomplete data   
Pro-actively drive continuous improvement for post-silicon memory related features
Must be a self-starter, and able to independently drive tasks to completion 


Preferred Experience

Own memory subsystem bring-up including DDR and HBM initialization, training, and validation during early boot stages.
Strong understanding of system‑level RAS architecture including error detection, correction, containment, escalation, and reporting.
Hands-on experience with memory RAS features such as ECC, CRC, Chipkill, symbol‑based ECC, demand/patrol scrubbing, spare‑row/column repair, and advanced memory resiliency modes.
Strong proficiency in debugging techniques using GDB and JTAG.
In-depth understanding of processor architecture and embedded systems design.
Excellent programming skills in C for low-level hardware manipulation.
Basic knowledge of scripting languages like Python.
In-depth knowledge of the different memory technologies
Strong understanding of x86,x64 architecture.
Experience using debugging tools like AMD HDT, ITP, and Lauterbach.
Good understanding of task prioritization and inter-process communication.
Product development or systems engineering background with hardware platforms and their software & firmware ecosystems 
Excellent verbal communication and written, presentation skills 
Excellent interpersonal, organizational, analytical, planning, and technical leadership skills 
Experience working in a fast-paced matrix-ed technical organization and multi-site environment


Academic Credentials

Bachelors or Masters degree (preferred) in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, Electrical Engineering, or equivalent 


Benefits offered are described: AMD benefits at a glance.

AMD does not accept unsolicited resumes from headhunters, recruitment agencies, or fee-based recruitment services. AMD and its subsidiaries are equal opportunity, inclusive employers and will consider all applicants without regard to age, ancestry, color, marital status, medical condition, mental or physical disability, national origin, race, religion, political and/or third-party affiliation, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, military or veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law. We encourage applications from all qualified candidates and will accommodate applicants’ needs under the respective laws throughout all stages of the recruitment and selection process.

AMD may use Artificial Intelligence to help screen, assess or select applicants for this position. AMD’s “Responsible AI Policy” is available here.

This posting is for an existing vacancy.



-------------------
51.
Full job description
About Ethernovia, Inc.

Ethernovia is fundamentally changing how cars of the future are built by unifying in-vehicle networks into an end-to-end Ethernet system. Founded in 2018, we're inventing the future of automobile's communication! We are transforming automobiles' communication network to enable the autonomous driving, electrical vehicle (EV) and software defined revolutions. Our breakthrough compute, communication, and software virtualization ushers in a new era of car connectivity and capabilities. We bring together, accelerate, and unify the car's cameras/sensors, compute, and outside world to enable new advanced driver assistance features and services.

Ethernovia's co-founders are serial technology entrepreneurs with multiple prior successful ventures together. We are well-funded and backed by some of the worlds' leading technology investors, having secured $64m in Series A funding. (Ethernovia Raises $64 Million to Accelerate the Revolution of Vehicle Networks | Business Wire). Our financial backers include Porsche SE, Qualcomm, AMD, and Western Digital

Ethernovia has been recognized in EE Times' prestigious list of the Top 100 Startups for 2025.

January 2024: Our CEO Ramin Shirani Named MotorTrend Software-Defined Vehicle Innovator Awards Winner (ethernovia.com)

September 2023: Continental and Ethernovia Announce Partnership to Develop Automotive Switch in 7nm - Ethernovia

Connected Car News: Helios, Continental, Ethernovia, Avanci, BMW, Mapbox, Porsche, SEMA, Honda, UltraSense, Flex Logix, Diodes Inc., Garmin, Toyota & Caruso | auto connected car news

With talented employees on 4 continents, we have filed > 50 patents to date.

Join Ethernovia's team to make a lasting impact on the future of mobility. Come share in our success with pre-IPO shares, competitive compensation, and great benefits while growing your knowledge and career with world class talent. We are looking for talented engineers and leaders who have an entrepreneurial spirit and want to drive their design from concept to silicon to their next car.


The Software team at Ethernovia builds cutting-edge software systems closely knit with our hardware communication and acceleration solutions. We build the full stack, starting from Software Modeling, Applications, SDK, Middleware, OS Kernel Drivers, Firmware, Compilers, Micro-code, Frameworks, Tools, Infrastructure and Evaluation/Test Platforms. All of this for automotive grade, safety critical systems with the highest grade of qualifications including MISRA, AUTOSAR and ASPICE.


Software Engineer – Firmware (Mid to Senior Level Available)


Location

Multiple Positions in Pune, India.


Remote Working

Considered on a case-by-case basis. Willingness to locate to Pune is highly desirable.


Job Description

You will be responsible for the Embedded Firmware for Ethernovia's Networking devices. This responsibility includes developing firmware that configures, controls, and monitors the communication device and interacts with the host system via device drivers to expose hardware features of the devices.

As a part of the Software team, you will be responsible for architecture, design, implementation, testing and integration of the firmware rolled into Ethernovia's SDK. This firmware is built ground-up for safety critical automotive application.

Also, we build products with strict adherence to Functional Safety and hence every team member is required to fit into a culture of safety and best development practices.


Technical Qualifications

Bachelors or Master's degree in Computer Science/Software or related field.
Work Experience: 3 years for Mid-level and 7 years for Senior Level position.
Strong understanding of Software Development lifecycle including Architecture, Implementation and Testing fundamentals.
Proficient in C/C++ Programming Language. Experience in Python is a plus.
Experience with Firmware, preferably for communication devices like Ethernet.
Experience with Embedded firmware, preferably for communication devices like Ethernet.
Experience with integration and testing of firmware and low-level code.
Hands on Experience with Hardware and embedded processors, preferably for communication devices.
Expertise in efficient code practices for code footprint and performance.

Nice to Have Experience with

Experience with simulation and emulation platforms.
GNU or similar compiler, debugging suite.
Embedded programming, preferably with communication devices and hardware buses like I2C, SPI, Ethernet, USB.
Building Automotive or other safety critical systems using qualification methods/processes like MISRA, ASPICE and ISO26262.
Communication protocols like Ethernet MAC, PHY, Switching, TCP/IP, Security, Serdes, PCIe, NTB, and SR-IOV.
Code Version Control and Review tools/processes like Perforce/Git, Swarm.
Automation and DevOps tools like Jenkins.
Mixed Signal systems - Analog, Digital, Digital Signal Processing (DSP).
ARM family of processors or similar embedded processors.
Bootloaders like uboot or similar.

Soft Skills

Self-motivated and able to work effectively both independently and in a team.
Excellent communication/documentation skills.
Attention to details.

What you'll get in return:


Technology depth and breadth expansion that can't be found in a large company
Opportunity to grow your career as the company grows
Pre IPO stock options
Cutting edge technology
World class team
Competitive base salary
Flexible hours
Medical, dental and vision insurance for employees
Flexible vacation time to promote a healthy work-life balance


---------

52.
About the Role
As a Senior Embedded Software Engineer at Baxter, you will play a critical role in designing, developing, and delivering high-quality software features and components that support the company's hospital products and healthcare innovations. Your expertise in embedded systems, C/C++ programming, and software development will enable you to drive technical solutions to complex problems and collaborate with internal and external stakeholders to advance Baxter's mission of expanding access to healthcare.



Key Responsibilities
Technical Leadership
Design, develop, and document software features or unit actors, ensuring high-quality solutions and adherence to technical standards.
Drive technical design reviews at software architecture level, ensuring alignment with company standards and best practices.
Lead software FMEA, technical risk mitigation, design review, unit test strategies, static code analysis, memory profiling, and thread modeling for components or features.


Collaboration and Communication
Partner with the Architect and LSD to define technical solutions to business problems, ensuring alignment with company goals and objectives.
Develop and execute technical solutions to complex problems, delivering high-quality solutions on tight schedules.
Drive collaboration with internal and external stakeholders, enabling the team to adopt better processes, practices, and technical guidance.
Technical Expertise
Expertise in C, C++ programming, design patterns, and multi-threading.
Hands-on experience with RTOS/Linux platform, unit test frameworks, and tracking tools like JIRA and version control systems like Github, Gerrit, etc.
Excellent oral and written communication skills, with the ability to articulate technical concepts to both technical and non-technical stakeholders.
Requirements
Bachelor's degree in Computer Science or related engineering field.
7+ years of related experience in embedded systems, with a strong background in C/C++ programming.
Experience in the Healthcare domain is desirable.
Strong technical leadership and collaboration skills, with the ability to drive technical solutions and enable team success.





------------

53.
Job Description

We are seeking a Firmware QA Engineer with strong hands-on experience in test frameworks, embedded systems, and quality assurance processes. This role is critical in validating firmware used in field instrumentation, data acquisition systems, and control devices specific to the Oil & Gas industry.

Key Responsibilities:

Design, develop, and execute automated and manual test cases for embedded firmware used in Oil & Gas equipment.
Develop and maintain test frameworks for regression, functional, integration, and system-level testing.
Perform hands-on testing of devices, including sensor calibration validation, real-time data acquisition, and communication protocols (Modbus, CAN, HART, RS485, etc.).
Analyze test results, log defects, and collaborate with development teams for root cause analysis and resolution.
Ensure firmware meets safety, reliability, and compliance standards (API, ISO, IEC, etc.).
Assist in development and execution of hardware-in-the-loop (HIL) testing strategies.
Work with cross-functional teams to define test strategies, traceability matrices, and quality metrics.
Support field deployment teams in testing and troubleshooting firmware-related issues under real-world conditions.

Qualifications
Bachelor’s degree in electrical engineering, Computer Engineering, or related field.
Good hands-on experience in firmware QA/testing, preferably in a regulated or industrial environment.
Strong hands-on experience with test frameworks like Google Test, Robot Framework, Unity (for C), or PyTest.
Proficiency in scripting languages (Python, Shell, etc.) for test automation.
Experience testing embedded systems, RTOS, device drivers, and communication interfaces.
Familiarity with oscilloscopes, logic analyzers, JTAG debuggers, and other lab equipment.
Working knowledge of SCADA, PLC, or industrial communication protocols is a plus.
Strong problem-solving and debugging skills
Preferred Qualifications:

Experience with firmware QA in the Oil & Gas, energy, or heavy industrial sector.
Exposure to safety-critical systems or compliance with industry-specific QA standards (e.g., IEC 61508, API standards, ATEX, SIL).
Experience with DevOps pipelines and CI/CD tools (Jenkins, GitLab CI).
Knowledge of hardware bring-up testing and field deployment validation.

----------

54.
JOB DESCRIPTION

As a Firmware Engineer, you will be responsible for supporting the firmware development team in the design, development and production of our firmware-supported products. You will be responsible for testing, documenting, and creating firmware standards.

REQUIREMENTS

Develop Embedded Firmware in C, C++ for 32/16/8-bit microcontrollers.
Should have prior experience in STM32, MSP430, IMX, PIC32 Microcontroller
Mandatory knowledge in at least one RTOS.
Experience in peripherals such as SPI, UART, I2C, etc.
Should have worked in tools such as IAR or Keil, debuggers, MPLAB, and code composer.
Knowledge of Zigbee, LoRa, Sigfox, Modbus, Profibus or foundation field bus protocol.
Prior experience in processor-based development (Jetson Nano/Xavier, TI – Sitara series, IMX) desired.
Linux driver, kernel, and bootloader development is a required skill.
Should have knowledge of Version Control System (SVN, GitHub)
Basic hardware debugging skills required
Familiar with tools such as CRO, Logic Analyzers etc.
Should have experience in Bootloader development

-----------------------

55.
Roles & Responsibilities:
Develop software (in 'C') to manage and control digital hardware blocks to implement wireless communication standards physical layer. Hardware <=> software partitioning, interfacing and combined validation. Implement/utilize low level software services like ISRs, timers, mutex, etc. Work closely with teams in the areas of micro-architecture, design, implementation, performance/power/area optimization and validation of different communication IPs. Using profiling, testing and other tools for firmware development.

Education, Experience & Skills:
Master's/Bachelor's Degree in engineering from a reputable college. 1 - 10 years of experience as a firmware engineer. Hands on experience in firmware or embedded software development. Good understanding of wireless standards and its physical layer. Communications theory/digital signal processing (DSP) background would be a plus. Familiarity/working knowledge of RTOS and ARM/MIPS based systems is a plus.


What are we looking for?
Strong candidates who look forward to Challenges.
People who take ownership of their Activities.
Those seeking to Learn and Grow in a unique environment where multiple competencies are being executed under one roof.
Those willing to commit for a long term in the company.


---------------

56.
Job description

Job Summary:

We are looking for a passionate and enthusiastic Embedded Firmware Engineer (Fresher) to join our engineering team. This role is ideal for recent graduates who have a strong foundation in electronics and programming, and a desire to work on real-world embedded systems.

Qualifications:

BE/BTech in Electronics and Communication Engineering or Computer Science (2024 or 2025 pass-outs preferred).
Strong academic understanding of Electronics, Digital Systems, and Embedded Systems.
Good knowledge of C programming.
Familiarity with microcontrollers, microprocessors, and basic embedded system concepts.
Key Responsibilities:

Assist in designing and developing firmware for embedded systems.
Write clean and efficient embedded C code under the guidance of senior engineers.
Support in debugging and testing of hardware and firmware.
Work with development boards, sensors, and peripherals to implement proof-of-concept solutions.
Document code and prepare test reports as needed.
Learn and adapt quickly to new technologies and tools.
Preferred Skills (Not Mandatory but a Plus):

Exposure to development tools like Keil, STM32CubeIDE, MPLAB, etc.
Familiarity with communication protocols (UART, SPI, I2C).
Basic understanding of RTOS concepts or hands-on project work using FreeRTOS.
Participation in relevant academic projects, internships, or hackathons.


-------------

57.
Job Description
Job Details
Company: VConnecTech Systems

Department: Systems

Employee Type: Regular Employee

Designation:Embedded Firmware engineer

Location:

Hyderabad, Telangana, India
Experience Required: 3 - 9 years

Job Summary
Job Description
Title/Position: Embedded Firmware engineer

Education: Bachelor's Degree / Diploma in Electronics

Key Responsibilities
Proficient in C programming for embedded systems.
Experience with Real-Time Operating Systems (RTOS), such as FreeRTOS, VxWorks, Zephyr, or others.
Expertise in bare-metal programming.
Hands-on experience with embedded communication protocols (I2C, SPI, UART, CAN, LIN, Ethernet, TCP/IP, USB).
Experience with ARM Cortex-M microcontrollers.
Knowledge on Linux BSP and Linux device driver development.
Experience in Linux porting/development and kernel concepts.
Knowledge of SiFive and RISC-V architectures is a plus.
Familiarity with Bluetooth and WiFi technologies is a plus.
Experience with or knowledge of Linux in embedded systems is a plus.
Strong experience in developing and interpreting electronic schematics and hardware design documentation.
Proven ability in porting applications and drivers across different hardware platforms.
Proficiency in using debugging and development tools such as Segger J-Link, Lauterbach debuggers, and Oscilloscopes.
Strong problem-solving and debugging skills.
Excellent communication and teamwork abilities.


-----------

58.

Job Description / Responsibilities

Design and develop firmware/software for automation products.
Hardware/Firmware integration.
Reliability testing of products.
Proficient in C and assembly language prgramming.
Understanding of microprocessors/microcontrollers architecture.
Ability to bring up hardware.
Proficiency in use of development tools.
Codewarrior knowledge desirable.
Knowledge of open source development tools a plus.
Knowledge of C++, Visual Studio, and Windows programming a plus
Windows CE OS and TCP/IP stack knowledge desirable.
Experience with 8051, Freescale processors desirable.
Prerequisites

Good aptitude for computers as well as mechatronics concepts.
Aggressive, dynamic, confident, great communications skills in English and local languages.
Good speaking skills, make presentation of small and large groups.
Understands the basic process of selling and has aptitude and desire to learn strategic selling skills from world renowned authorities.
Good communication skills and leadership skills.

---------------

59.
Full job description
Following are the requirements for the present opening

Strong C / C++ programming knowledge or capability
Prior knowledge of Embedded C programming is preferred.
Knowledge of IDE / ICE / ICD like IAR EWB.
Experience / exposure to 32 bit architectures like ARM (MCUs and MPUs).
Knowledge of microcontroller peripherals and interfaces like UART / SPI / I2C / ADC / DAC / PWM etc.
Knowledge of RTOS concepts will be an added advantage.
Basic knowledge of fundamental analog and digital electronics.
Basic knowledge of electronic components and devices.
Education:

UG – B.Tech/B.E. – Any Specialization, Computers, Electrical, Electronics/Telecommunication, Instrumentation; PG- Post Graduation Not Required

-------------

60.
Job Description

We're looking for a Staff Software Engineer with 5+ years of experience to lead the design and implementation of our host-side PCIe drivers. You will architect and build a high-performance, multi-OS driver solution that supports complex hardware topologies. This role requires deep expertise in low-level system software, cross-platform driver development, and a proven ability to lead technical initiatives.

Key Responsibilities

Multi-OS PCIe Driver Development: You will serve as the technical lead for designing and implementing high-performance PCIe kernel-mode drivers for both Linux and Windows. Your work will be crucial in developing a robust architecture that supports multiple endpoints across multiple cards and ensures reliable communication.

User-Space Library & PyTorch Runtime Integration: Architect and implement a high-performance user-space library that directly interfaces with the kernel-mode driver. This library will be the primary communication channel for the PyTorch runtime, providing a seamless and efficient way to send commands and data to the device.

PCIe Switch Management: Architect and implement the driver logic to support complex hardware topologies involving multiple PCIe cards connected over an external PCIe switch. You'll be responsible for the sophisticated driver logic required to identify and correctly set up the PCI device address for each individual PCIe device on each card.

Performance & Reliability: Take ownership of the driver's performance, ensuring high-bandwidth and low-latency data transfers. You'll be responsible for the stability and reliability of the system, designing robust error handling and recovery mechanisms.

Cross-Functional Leadership: Collaborate closely with hardware, firmware, and user-space software teams. You will be a key voice in defining system-wide architectural requirements and ensuring a cohesive, end-to-end solution.

Mentorship: Guide and mentor other engineers, providing technical direction and fostering a culture of excellence in low-level software development.

Required Qualifications

Experience: 5+ years of hands-on experience in low-level system software development.

Kernel-Mode Expertise: Deep, hands-on experience designing and developing kernel-mode drivers for both Linux and Windows.

Linux: In-depth knowledge of the Linux kernel driver model and debugging tools.

Windows: Extensive experience with the Windows Driver Kit (WDK) and the WDM/KMDF driver models.

PCIe Architecture: Expert-level understanding of the PCIe specification, including complex topologies involving switches, bus numbering, and device address management.

Problem-Solving: Exceptional debugging skills and a proven track record of solving the most challenging system-level problems.

Leadership: Demonstrated ability to lead technical projects and mentor engineers.

Education: Bachelor's or Master's degree in Computer Science, Electrical Engineering, or a related field.


Qualifications

Required Qualifications

Experience: 8+ years of hands-on experience in low-level system software development.

Kernel-Mode Expertise: Deep, hands-on experience designing and developing kernel-mode drivers for both Linux and Windows.
Linux: In-depth knowledge of the Linux kernel driver model and debugging tools.
Windows: Extensive experience with the Windows Driver Kit (WDK) and the WDM/KMDF driver models.
PCIe Architecture: Expert-level understanding of the PCIe specification, including complex topologies involving switches, bus numbering, and device address management.
Problem-Solving: Exceptional debugging skills and a proven track record of solving the most challenging system-level problems.
Leadership: Demonstrated ability to lead technical projects and mentor engineers.
Education: Bachelor's or Master's degree in Computer Science, Electrical Engineering, or a related field.
_______________




